ADMINISTRATION’S  PROPOSAL  TO  REAUTHORIZE 

THE  FEDERAL  AVIATION  ADMINISTRATION 

( PART  I ) 

S.  HRG.  110–1109 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION OPERATIONS, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

FEBRUARY  15,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

73–237 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 
LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  AVIATION  OPERATIONS,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia, 

Chairman 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on February 15, 2007  .......................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Lott 
......................................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

Blakey, Hon. Marion C., Administrator, Federal Aviation Administration  ........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

APPENDIX 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
Response to written questions submitted to Hon. Marion C. Blakey by: 

Hon. Thomas R. Carper  ...................................................................................
Hon. Byron L. Dorgan  ......................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg  ...............................................................................
Hon. Mark Pryor  ...............................................................................................

Page 
1 
2 
1 
12 
20 
17 
25 

3 
5 

29 

44 
36 
29 
38 
41 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

ADMINISTRATION’S  PROPOSAL  TO 

REAUTHORIZE  THE  FEDERAL  AVIATION 

ADMINISTRATION  (PART  I) 

THURSDAY,  FEBRUARY  15,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION OPERATIONS, SAFETY, AND 
SECURITY, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Committee met, pursuant to notice, at 9:37 a.m. in room SR– 
253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  John  D.  Rockefeller  IV, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Senator Rockefeller has been delayed. And 
so,  he  suggests  that  we  get  started,  and  I  agree  with  that.  Taking 
the prerogative of the chair, I’m in charge, and I may change budg-
ets. Well, no, we’ll just get ourselves going, I would, first of all, wel-
come  Ms.  Blakey.  We  have  met  in  these  conditions  many  times, 
and it’s good to see you again. 

I  will  make  a  very  short  statement,  as  the  Acting  Chairman 
here,  and,  as  we  begin  the  process  of  reauthorizing  the  FAA,  I’d 
like to specifically focus on safety and our ability to manage future 
increases in air traffic. 

Seven hundred and sixty million people will fly this year, and it’s 
expected  that  by  2015  the  number  will  hit  1  billion.  Additional, 
5,000  very  light  jets  will  be  carrying  passengers  over  the  next  10 
years.  That’s  going  to  add  challenges  to  an  already  strained  sys-
tem. 

Last  year  was  the  worst  year  for  flight  delays  since  the  year 
2000. One in four airplane flights were late. Newark Liberty Inter-
national, unfortunately, had the worst delays in America. For trav-
elers who fly between Washington and New York/New Jersey area, 
a  36-minute  flight  often  comes  to  2  hours  because  of  delays.  We 
will look to the FAA for leadership in managing these demands. At 
the front line of both safety and increases in traffic are our air traf-
fic controllers. Our air traffic controllers are retiring in large num-
bers, and the FAA is not replacing them quickly enough. There are 
a thousand fewer controllers now than we had a few years ago, and 
it  takes  several  years  to  train  new  controllers.  We  are  seven  con-
trollers short at Newark Airport. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

The FAA and our Nation’s airports are also moving too slowly to 
upgrade  runway  safety  areas  to  prevent  overruns.  And  runway  in-
cursions are listed by the National Transportation Safety Board as 
a  major  safety  concern.  So,  in  response,  I  will  help  craft  com-
prehensive runway safety legislation this year to address these and 
other problems. 

And finally, I would note that the Administration wants to widen 
the  approach  paths  for  Newark  Liberty  and  other  airports  in  the 
New  Jersey,  New  York,  Philadelphia  region.  Air  noise  is  already  a 
problem in New Jersey, and this change would only make it a larg-
er one by spreading out planes over a wider area of the skies above 
New Jersey. 

So,  I  hope  that  the  FAA  is  going  to  reexamine  this  proposal, 
make  sure  that  it  is  necessary  to  do  that,  and  to  evaluate  its  im-
pact on the people of my state. We’re going to be watching the proc-
ess  very  carefully,  because  aircraft  noise  is  already  a  major  prob-
lem in the New York/New Jersey area. 

And,  with  that,  I  will  follow  the  procedures  that  Senator  Rocke-
feller  is  using,  if  the  staff  can  correct  me,  and  that  is  5-minute 
statements around the table. 

Senator Klobuchar? Thank you. Five minutes. 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Senator. 
And  thank  you,  Ms.  Blakey,  for  coming  today,  and  for  beginning 

this conversation on the FAA reauthorization. 

I’m from Minnesota. As you know, we have a major airport there, 

and so, we’re very interested in these issues. 

I  think  we’d  all  agree  on  one  goal,  that  we  need  to  build  a  cut-
ting-edge,  next  generation  air  traffic  control  system  that  uses  the 
latest  advancement  in  satellite-based  technologies.  This  system 
should allow us to increase capacity, improve safety and efficiency, 
reduce noise near airports, and reduce delays. 

Controlling  costs  is  a  huge  part  of  this.  I’ve  read  the  proposal 
that  you  have  for  switching  from  a  financing  system  based  largely 
on  ticket  taxes  to  one  based  more  on  user  fees.  I’m  not  quite  con-
vinced  yet  that  this  is  the  way  to  go,  but  we  do  look  forward  to 
hearing more about it. 

And,  in  my  view,  as  we  look  at  a  financing  approach,  we  have 
to  look  at  four  criteria.  First  of  all,  it  must  be  in  the  best  interest 
of  the  traveling  public.  Second,  it  must  produce  sufficient  revenue 
to  cover  our  aviation  needs,  our  safety  needs,  our  technological 
needs,  our  commercial  needs,  our  air  traffic  control  needs,  with,  of 
course, help from the General Fund. And it also must avoid unnec-
essary  complexity  and  be  relatively  easy  to  administer.  And,  fi-
nally,  it  must  distribute  the  cost  of  the  system  among  the  users  of 
the system in a way that is sensible and fair. 

It remains to be seen whether these criteria are best met by our 
current  system,  with  some  modifications,  or  by  a  substantially  dif-
ferent approach. This is what these hearings are about. 

There  are  other  issues  that  are  important  to  me,  as  well,  as  we 
move  forward  with  this  reauthorization.  Some  of  these  include  en-
suring that our small airports continue to receive the support that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

they  need  to  maintain  the  vitality  of  rural  America,  ensuring  that 
our  airports  and  airplanes  are  maintained  with  safety  as  the  first 
and  paramount  priority,  ensuring  that  we  have  enough  qualified 
air traffic controllers to fill our needs nationwide, and then, finally, 
ensuring that Congress exercises proper oversight over FAA’s budg-
et. 

Today  marks  the  beginning  of  an  important  dialogue  on  a  vital 
part  of  American  commerce  and  American  life.  I’m  excited  to  be 
part of this. 

And, I thank you very much. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
And now, we’re pleased to hear from the FAA Administrator, Ms. 

Blakey, please. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARION C. BLAKEY, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  I’m  delighted  to  be  here,  Senator  Lautenberg,  and 
very  pleased,  also,  to  be  working  with  you,  Senator  Klobuchar,  be-
cause this—I do know that you have a very vital aviation link right 
there  in  Minneapolis-St.  Paul,  and  one  of  our  major  airlines  there. 
So, I welcome our discussions in the future. 

What  brings  me  before  you  this  morning,  of  course,  is  a  matter 
of  national  significance;  indeed,  it  is  a  scenario  that  affects  every 
man,  woman,  and  child  in  this  great  Nation,  that  affects  every 
business,  from  blue  chips  to  the  corner  store.  The  common  thread 
among each of these is aviation. The United States of America has 
long  depended  on  aviation,  not  just  as  a  means  of  point-to-point 
travel,  but  as  the  hinge  on  which  the  door  to  commerce  literally 
stays open. Aviation keeps America open for business. 

As  you’re  well  aware,  the  National  Airspace  System  is  rapidly 
approaching  critical  mass.  Senator  Lautenberg,  you’re  hitting  the 
nail  on  the  head  when  you’re  talking  about  the  kind  of  delays  we 
are seeing on the East Coast; and Newark is a prime example. For 
years,  the  word  ‘‘gridlock’’  has  been  bandied  about.  For  years,  ex-
perts have pointed to a system that is stretched too thin, a system 
that  simply  will  not  be  able  to  accommodate  all  those  looking  to 
use it. The day is now here, and we have it upon us. 

As passengers, I think we all know, not just from headlines, that 
the year 2006 was the worst in history for delays across the board. 
Conversely, that highpoint for delays occurred simultaneously with 
what  can  only  be  described  as  the  ‘‘Golden  Age  of  Safety.’’  Our  pi-
lots  are  first-rate.  Our  controllers  are  the  envy  of  the  world.  The 
people who service our equipment are acknowledged experts, capa-
ble of handling anything, from the devastation of a hurricane—and 
we’ve  had  plenty  of  those—to  sophisticated  software  upgrades, 
where we continue to try to patch the system. Our safety inspectors 
are  so  good  that  they’ve  helped  whittle  away  the  list  of  accident 
causes, to the point that they almost never happen. 

And  yet,  amazingly,  the  system  is  in  trouble.  It’s  grossly  ineffi-
cient. And everyone who flies it, knows it. The system’s in trouble, 
because we have squeezed every ounce of capacity that’s out there. 
In some cases, we’ve imposed artificial constraints—for example, in 
places  like  Chicago  and  New  York,  trying  to  stem  the  stream  of 
passenger  jets  that  always  seem  to  want  to  take  off  at  7  a.m.  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

come  home  at  5  p.m.  in  the  evening,  usually  on  the  same  day. 
Schedules, packed to the gills with delays, missed connections, and 
canceled  flights,  are  all-too-common  these  days  across  the  country. 
So,  what’s  in  front  of  us?  The  undeniable  fact  is  that  we  face  a 
billion  passengers  by  2015.  We  face  an  ever  increasing  number  of 
very light business jets, with new models that we welcome, like the 
Eclipse  and  the  Diamond  D.  Traffic  levels,  as  we  know  them,  will 
double, perhaps even triple, in the not-too-far-distant future. 

The  logical  question  that  follows  goes  like  this:  If  we  have  the 
best  people  and  the  safest  planes,  why  don’t  we  have  the  best  sys-
tem? The question from the passenger who flies in the middle seat 
is  a  bit  more  pointed:  Why  is  commercial  travel  becoming  such  a 
nightmare? 

I’m here today to tell Members of the Committee that the Band- 
Aid  solutions  of  the  past  will  not  be  enough  to  deal  with  this 
change  with  the  challenges  in  front  of  us.  We  can’t  keep  trying  to 
scale  up  an  air  traffic  control  system  that’s  based  largely  on  tech-
nologies  from  the  1950s  and  1960s.  We  need  to  take  bold  action. 
And,  with  taxes  and  user  fees  expiring  in  September,  we  have  a 
once-in-a-decade  opportunity  to  do  so.  The  next  6  months  are  the 
pivot point. If other countries around the world are moving toward 
the system of the future, why can’t we? Aviation is just too critical 
for  Americans  to  be  satisfied  with  taking  a  backseat  to  the  rest  of 
the world. 

Fortunately,  there’s  good  news  on  the  horizon.  We  know  the  an-
swer to the challenge that brings us here today. America needs the 
Next-Generation  Air  Transportation  System.  Without  it,  we  will 
cease  to  set  the  pace  for  global  aviation.  We  will  be  the  country 
others will be talking about as a lessons-learned exercise, the coun-
try that could identify its problems, but couldn’t fix them. 

In  layman’s  terms,  the  NextGen  is  an  integrated  plan  utilizing 
modern technology, updated procedures, and new equipment to get 
us  beyond  the  current  system  of  ground-based  radar  technology 
and  into  the  second  century  of  aviation,  with  satellite-based  oper-
ations.  Let’s  face  it,  satellite  technology  has  revolutionized  the 
trucking  industry.  Trains  use  it.  Fishermen  use  it.  Hikers  in  our 
national  parks  use  satellites.  Isn’t  it  about  time  we  put  this  tech-
nology into the hands of our pilots and our controllers? 

Make no mistake, this isn’t pie-in-the-sky. We have a clear vision 
for NextGen, and a plan to execute it. Both were developed in part-
nership  with  our  stakeholders  and  from  across  the  spectrum  of 
aviation, from pilots and airlines, to mechanics, to Wall Street, and 
beyond. They agree. We agree. NextGen will get us where aviation 
needs  to  go.  But  we  need  to  act  quickly  if  we  hope  to  avoid  that 
doomsday scenario. 

‘‘Why is this so important?’’ you might ask. Countries like China, 
India,  Australia  are  aggressively  adopting  satellite  technologies. 
Europe  is  moving  ahead  with  SESAR.  That’s  the  rival  version  of 
NextGen, and it’s based on satellites. 

Fact is, the rest of the world is not waiting for the United States. 
And, while the rest of the world has their action plan in high gear, 
we  risk  getting  bogged  down  in  a  debate  over  who’s  going  to  pick 
up the tab. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

Truth be told, right now the passenger in the middle seat is foot-
ing  the  lion’s  share  of  the  bill  for  the  operation  of  the  system.  The 
commercial traveler is paying 95 percent of the costs, but is impos-
ing  only  73  percent  of  the  requirements.  Imagine  being  at  a  res-
taurant where you’re required to pick up the tab for the people sit-
ting at the next table. It’s not as farfetched as it sounds. It happens 
in our skies every day. A seat on a commercial jetliner is the most 
heavily taxed spot in aviation. 

This  year  is  a  once-in-a-lifetime  opportunity,  presenting  a  rare 
chance  to  leave  an  extraordinary  legacy  for  our  children.  But  to 
successfully  develop  the  NextGen  system,  we  need  a  revenue 
stream  that’s  tied  to  the  actual  costs  of  our  operations.  We  need  a 
revenue stream that’s equitable. In other words, all users pay their 
fair share. 

I  can’t  say  it  more  clearly.  The  hybrid  financing  system  that  we 
put  on  the  table  yesterday  is  balanced,  is  fair,  and  it  delivers  on 
all  these  counts.  A  cost-based  system  is  much  more  transparent 
and  accountable  for  the  FAA,  for  passengers,  and  for  users.  And, 
frankly,  it  gives  Congress  much  more  insight  into  the  costs  of  our 
operations for oversight purposes. 

Despite all the hype that you’ve undoubtedly been hearing, mov-
ing to a user-based system is hardly unprecedented. In fact, I men-
tioned  several  countries  before,  but  here’s  another  list  to  think 
about:  Barbados,  Brunei,  Guinea-Bissau,  Kiribati,  Kuwait,  Na-
mibia,  Sa˜o  Tome´ and  Principe,  Swaziland,  Togo,  and  Tuvalu.  That 
list  represents  the  only  countries  that  do  not  charge  for  the  actual 
cost of air traffic services. Do we really want the most powerful na-
tion in the world to be on that list? 

Speaking  on  behalf  of  everyone  who  flies,  the  first  and  foremost 
benefits of our proposal are to the passenger. The bill that’s moving 
forward reduces congestion. It alleviates delays. It provides tax re-
lief. It’s green. And, make no mistake, it delivers the technology to 
make  all  of  this  happen.  This  is  the  only  way  to  go.  America  has 
the opportunity. We have the solution; and we need to put it in mo-
tion. 

In  closing,  let  me  say  that  we  have  been  presented  with  a  his-
toric opportunity to alter the future of aviation by creating a next- 
generation  system  that  truly  delivers.  We  owe  it  to  the  traveling 
public. We owe it to America. Our economy hinges on aviation, and 
we  can  ill  afford  to  blow  this  chance  to  give  our  citizens  a  system 
that  can  handle  what  the  future  may  bring  and  avoid  all  the  grid-
lock. 

The  Members  of  this  Subcommittee  will  be  very  key  players  in 
this  endeavor,  and  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  make  it 
happen. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Blakey follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARION C. BLAKEY, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION 

Chairman  Rockefeller,  Senator  Lott,  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  am  happy 
to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  Administration’s  proposal  to  reauthorize 
the  programs  of  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA).  I  have  mentioned  in 
my  previous  appearances  before  you  that  we  have  been  working  very  hard  on  this 
proposal for quite some time. With both our programs and our funding set to expire 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

at  the  end  of  the  fiscal  year,  we  are  presented  with  an  important  opportunity  to 
make needed changes. 

The  essential  question  is:  why  should  we  change  the  current  financing  mecha-
nisms? The answer, simply put, is that the current mechanisms are not well suited 
to  support  the  transformation  to  the  Next  Generation  Air  Transportation  System 
(NextGen).  This  transformation  is  essential.  As  we  look  out  into  the  future,  we  see 
a  system  that  will  need  to  grow  to  accommodate  the  demands  of  our  stakeholders 
and  the  flying  public.  The  current  financing  mechanisms—both  in  terms  of  taxes 
and  spending—are  not  tied  to  FAA’s  cost  to  deliver  services,  and  therefore  are  not 
scalable  to  meet  these  growing  demands.  To  deliver  the  benefits  of  NextGen,  it  is 
essential  that  a  reliable  funding  stream  that  better  ties  our  income  and  our  outgo 
are  better  tied  to  the  services  we  provide.  NextGen  is  a  reachable  goal  only  if  its 
development  and  integration  is  not  left  to  the  characteristics  of  a  funding  system 
that  does  not  cover  the  costs  of  the  system  and  the  services  provided.  A  reliable 
funding  foundation  is  essential  and  failure  to  provide  one  may  well  result  in  tan-
gible programmatic problems in the near term. 

Ten  years  ago,  the  last  funding  debate  resulted  in  a  lapse  of  the  taxes.  At  that 
time, the uncommitted balance of the Aviation Trust Fund was sufficient to sustain 
continued funding of the aviation accounts without disruption to the system. Today, 
the  Trust  Fund  balance  cannot  support  such  a  lapse,  and  thus  such  a  lapse  would 
have potentially significant consequences. We must approach our work this year as 
being  crucial  to  the  future  of  aviation.  I  am  sure  the  debate  will  be  robust  and  I 
am  anxious  to  take  part  in  it.  We  all  understand  the  importance  of  this  industry, 
just  as  we  are  all  committed  to  its  success.  It  is  because  of  our  shared  values  and 
goals  for  aviation  that  I  am  confident  that  hard  work  and  dedication  will  result  in 
a new and better system for funding the FAA. 

The  Administration’s  proposal  creates  a  financing  system  where  what  users  pay 
into  the  system—whether  user  fees  or  taxes—and  the  benefits  they  get  out  of  the 
system  will  be  more  stable  and  transparent.  The  proposal  adopts  a  cost-based  fi-
nancing system for the FAA through new user fees and fuel taxes. Most commercial 
aviation operators would pay for the costs of air traffic control services through user 
fees and general aviation would pay for these services through a cost-based fuel tax. 
The new user fees will allow aviation users to pay directly for the services that FAA 
provides  in  managing  the  use  of  the  national  airspace.  This  linkage  between  what 
users pay and what FAA invests in will be critical to facilitate our transition to the 
NextGen modernization of the air traffic control system. 

The new system will facilitate more reliable, more predictable, and less congested 
air travel for the traveling public. A newly created Board will give our stakeholders 
a significant role in key agency financial decisions and will provide strong incentives 
for  the  FAA  to  control  costs  and  meet  the  demand  for  services  efficiently.  The  fi-
nancing  proposal  is  the  product  of  both  significant  consultation  with  the  public,  in-
cluding  our  aviation  stakeholders,  as  well  as  a  detailed  analysis  of  the  current  fi-
nancing system and various alternatives. We have attempted to balance the diverse 
views  that  our  stakeholders  have  expressed  with  the  need  for  a  stable,  equitable, 
and  cost-based  funding  structure.  Our  recommended  solution  builds  on  the  work  of 
numerous bipartisan commissions from the past two decades, including the National 
Civil Aviation Review Commission that Congress created and that former Secretary 
Mineta chaired approximately 10 years ago. 

Today’s funding system is largely based on taxes that are, for the most part unre-
lated to the costs of the services provided by the FAA. While this system has worked 
well in the past, changes in the industry require that we replace it with something 
that better reflects the cost of providing service. The success of low cost carriers has 
been  a  tremendous  benefit  to  the  flying  public,  but  in  many  instances  it  results  in 
two identical operations, imposing identical costs to the FAA, paying very differently 
into the system because so much of the current revenue stream is based on the cost 
of  the  ticket.  Similarly,  as  airlines  work  to  control  costs  per  enplanement,  they  are 
using  increasing  numbers  of  small  aircraft.  This  trend  adds  to  the  workload  of  our 
air traffic system without increasing tax revenue commensurately. If an airline car-
ries the same number of passengers (at the same fares) on two smaller jets instead 
of  one  larger  jet,  the  tax  revenues  do  not  change,  but  the  controller  workload  dou-
bles.  Our  latest  forecasts  indicate  that  the  trend  to  use  smaller  aircraft  by  airlines 
will continue, especially as the current system provides no incentives to the airlines 
to respond to the costs that a switch from large jets to regional jets imposes on the 
air transportation system. 

The  results  of  these  trends  are  best  captured  in  the  two  charts  that  I  have  in-
cluded with this statement. The first depicts the uncommitted balance in the Trust 
Fund  in  FY  2006.  This  information  clearly  supports  the  need  for  immediate  action 
to prevent any lapse in funding. The second chart compares the Trust Fund revenue 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

to the activity levels in the system. There is clearly no connection between the two. 
The recent industry changes I discussed have resulted in this disconnect being even 
more apparent. It is extremely important that a connection be established to ensure 
an uninterrupted, stable, reliable funding stream to transition us to NextGen. 

Under  the  current  tax  structure,  it  is  clear  that  taxes  paid  by  different  user  cat-
egories do not generally reflect the costs those users impose on the system. Commer-
cial  airlines  and  their  passengers  currently  pay  over  95  percent  of  the  Trust  Fund 
taxes, but our cost allocation shows that they account for approximately 73 percent 
of  air  traffic  costs.  In  many  cases,  ‘‘high  end’’  turbine  (jet  and  turboprop)  general 
aviation (GA) flights are consuming similar FAA and airspace resources as the com-
mercial operators, but paying only a fraction of what commercial operators pay. 

Because of the fundamental disconnect between the existing tax structure and the 
FAA’s  workload,  we  strongly  believe  that  the  FAA  needs  to  move  to  a  different, 
more rational funding mechanism. I want to be clear that this proposal is not about 
collecting  more  money  for  the  FAA,  it  is  about  creating  a  more  rational,  equitable, 
and  stable  system  that  provides  appropriate  incentives  to  airspace  users  to  effi-
ciently  use  increasingly  congested  airspace,  to  the  FAA  to  control  costs.  Moreover, 
by  adopting  new  discretionary  user  fees,  the  Administration’s  proposal  gives  FAA 
the  flexibility  to  meet  the  financing  challenges  of  NextGen  and  facilitates  mod-
ernization of the aviation system on an assured and predictable basis. 

Let me describe in greater detail how our proposal would fund the different parts 

of the FAA. 
Proposed Funding for the Air Traffic Organization (ATO) 

The cost of ATO’s services will primarily be funded by those operating in the sys-
tem. The manner of contribution will vary depending on the type of operation. Tur-
bine commercial flights would primarily pay user fees; general aviation and all pis-
ton-powered flights would primarily pay fuel taxes; and the General Fund would fi-
nance the costs of services provided to public users and other programs that we be-
lieve are in the general public interest. 

User  fees  would  apply  to  turbine  commercial  flights,  including  those  by  U.S.  and 
foreign  airlines,  passenger  and  freight  carriers,  domestic  and  international  flights, 
charter  operators,  and  regional  airlines.  They  would  cover  all  flights  by  jet  aircraft 
that  are  considered  commercial  under  current  tax  code,  including  air  taxis  and 
flights operated under fractional ownership. Collecting user fees for air traffic serv-
ices is an internationally accepted practice in widespread use around the world, and 
would be consistent with the recommendations of at least seven bipartisan commis-
sions  that  have  studied  this  issue  over  the  last  two  decades.  These  fees  would  be 
based  on  data  derived  from  the  agency’s  cost  accounting  and  cost  allocation  sys-
tems—including  the  operations,  maintenance,  and  overhead  expenses  for  the  serv-
ices  provided,  the  facilities  and  equipment  used  in  such  services,  and  the  projected 
costs for the period during which the services are provided. Existing U.S. overflight 
fees would be integrated into these new user fees. While the proposal gives the FAA 
and its users latitude in how the fees would be structured, these fees would clearly 
tie FAA revenues much more closely to the actual cost of the services provided. We 
anticipate that approximately three-fourths of the Air Traffic Organization’s budget 
would  come  from  these  user  fees.  The  fees  would  be  dedicated  to  air  traffic  control 
and  related  services  and  would  be  treated  as  discretionary  offsetting  collections  for 
budget purposes. The proposal also authorizes a reserve, funded by user fees, which 
FAA would use to minimize the need for increases in fee rates that might otherwise 
be  required  to  avoid  funding  shortfalls  attributable  to  unanticipated  reductions  in 
aviation activity, or to emergency requirements. 

The  general  aviation  (GA)  community  and  piston  commercial  operations  would 
contribute  their  allocated  share  of  air  traffic  control  costs  primarily  via  a  fuel  tax. 
DOT  has  considered  stakeholder  feedback  from  this  community  and  accepts  the  ar-
gument that the efficiency and simplicity of the fuel tax mechanism merit its contin-
ued  use  as  the  primary  mechanism  for  GA’s  contribution  to  FAA  funding.  Our  goal 
is to identify the costs associated with these users and then to set the fuel tax rates 
to  recover  those  costs.  We  anticipate  that  just  over  10  percent  of  the  ATO’s  budget 
would  come  from  these  taxes,  which  would  continue  to  be  deposited  in  the  Airport 
and  Airway  Trust  Fund  and  be  subject  to  appropriation.  The  bill  proposes  periodi-
cally  recalibrating  the  portion  of  the  GA  fuel  tax  dedicated  to  funding  ATO  based 
on updates to FAA’s cost allocation study. 

In  addition  to  the  fuel  tax,  GA  and  piston  commercial  flights  may  be  subject  to 
a  terminal  user  fee  when  they  arrive  or  depart  at  one  of  a  limited  number  of  large 
hub  airports.  In  general,  these  airports  are  the  most  congested  terminal  facilities 
in the aviation system, and all users at congested facilities contribute to congestion 
for  other  users.  Given  that  large  hub  airports  are  in  metropolitan  areas  that  have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

alternative  airports,  which  would  not  be  subject  to  this  fee,  we  believe  it  is  appro-
priate to apply fees to all users of the most congested airports. 

The  costs  associated  with  air  traffic  control  service  for  military  and  other  public 
users,  as  well  as  other  functions  and  services  deemed  to  be  in  the  general  public 
interest would be funded from the General Fund appropriation, as discussed below. 
Proposed Funding for Aviation Safety 

The funding proposal includes modest user fees to pay for the costs of 25 activities 
in  the  areas  of  certification  and  registration.  These  include  issuance  of  certain  cer-
tificates, appointment and training of designees, registration of aircraft and airmen, 
airmen  medical  certificates,  and  training  provided  to  other  aviation  authorities.  All 
of  these  activities  are  specific  services  that  FAA  provides  for  individual  businesses; 
other  Federal,  state  and  local  government  agencies  charge  for  similar  services,  as 
do  many  international  aviation  authorities.  In  fact,  FAA  currently  charges  fees  for 
many of these services; however, the current fees are set significantly below the cost 
of  providing  the  service.  The  legislation  specifies  the  amount  to  be  charged  for  12 
specific  services.  Thirteen  other  activities  are  identified  for  which  fees  will  be  col-
lected,  but  do  not  have  the  unit  charge  specified  as  FAA’s  cost  accounting  system 
is  still  being  implemented  with  respect  to  regulation  and  certification  activities.  As 
with the ATO fees, the charges for these activities will be determined based on the 
available data derived from the agency’s cost accounting and cost allocation systems 
and  revenue  from  the  fees  would  be  treated  as  offsetting  collections.  Based  on  the 
historical  cost  of  these  activities,  DOT  anticipates  that  approximately  10  percent  of 
FAA’s Aviation Safety budget will come from user fees. 

Regardless  of  the  type  of  product  or  amount  of  fee  determined  for  that  product, 
FAA  will  always  make  fee  decisions  considering  safety  first.  We  are  also  mindful 
of the significant international leadership role of both the FAA and the U.S. indus-
try, and the fact that benefits from many aviation safety functions (such as ongoing 
surveillance)  are  widely  dispersed  to  the  traveling  and  non-traveling  public.  No  fee 
structure  will  compromise  the  FAA’s  statutory  safety  responsibilities  or  the  U.S. 
aviation  community’s  ability  to  remain  the  world’s  principal  system  innovator.  As 
a  result,  we  are  proposing  that  the  vast  majority  of  FAA’s  aviation  safety  respon-
sibilities remain funded from the General Fund. 
General Fund Proposal 

The  Administration  derived  its  General  Fund  proposal  by  evaluating  specific  ac-
tivities  to  determine  whether  they  are  in  the  general  public  interest  and  have  a 
compelling  case  for  a  General  Fund  appropriation.  The  dollar  figures  in  the  reau-
thorization proposal are based on the following activities and services: 

• Air  traffic  costs  allocated  to  public  users  (military,  other  government  aircraft, 
and  air  ambulances),  because  DOT  views  providing  air  traffic  control  services 
to these flights as serving the public good; 
• Flight  service  stations,  because  charging  user  fees  for  these  services  would  en-
courage  general  aviation  pilots  to  fly  ‘‘outside  the  system,’’  which  would  have 
a negative safety impact; 
• Low  activity  towers,  because  they  help  provide  safe  access  to  the  aviation  sys-
tem to numerous small communities and are a critical part of the national avia-
tion  infrastructure;  the  primary  users  of  these  terminals  (piston  aircraft)  likely 
cannot  bear  the  cost  of  funding  them,  even  though  many  of  these  towers  are 
contract towers, which are the FAA’s most cost-efficient facilities; 
• Safety  regulation  and  oversight  that  are  not  recovered  by  user  fees,  because 
these  regulatory  functions  benefit  the  general  public  by  contributing  to  a  safe 
and reliable air transportation system; 
• Commercial Space Transportation, because, given the early and volatile state of 
the industry, it would be virtually impossible to develop a schedule of fees that 
would generate significant revenue without unduly burdening the industry and 
placing U.S. companies at a competitive disadvantage compared to heavily sub-
sidized firms from other countries; and 
• The safety portion of Research, Engineering and Development (RE&D) related to 
aging  aircraft  and  aircraft  catastrophic  failure  prevention  (approximately  $17 
million  of  the  RE&D  budget),1 because  this  research  supports  FAA’s  ‘‘public 
good’’ regulatory functions. 

1 The  remainder  of  RE&D  would  be  funded  from  the  Airport  and  Airway  Trust  Fund,  and  is 
included in the universal fuel tax rate discussed below under ‘‘Proposed Funding for AIP, RE&D 
and EAS.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

Transition and Elimination of Other Aviation Excise Taxes 

The  Administration  proposes  that  the  changes  to  the  aviation  financing  system 
take  effect  at  the  start  of  Fiscal  Year  2009,  in  order  to  provide  the  FAA  with  suffi-
cient time to establish user fees and implement a billing and collection system. Our 
proposal  therefore  extends  the  current  excise  taxes  for  1  year  to  ensure  that  the 
FAA has sufficient funding in FY 2008. 

As  of  FY  2009,  the  existing  domestic  ticket  tax  (including  the  tax  on  mileage 
awards), domestic segment tax, cargo waybill tax, and Alaska/Hawaii departure tax 
would  expire  under  our  proposal.  The  proposed  user  fees,  adjusted  fuel  taxes,  and 
the adjusted international arrival and departure tax would replace these taxes. This 
represents a significant simplification of the aviation excise tax system. 
FAA Governance 

A  review  of  air  traffic  service  providers  around  the  world  shows  that  one  of  the 
common  changes  accompanying  the  introduction  of  user  fees  is  adoption  of  a  ‘‘user 
pays,  user  says’’  policy—according  users  a  significant  role  in  decisions  relating  to 
the setting of fees and the use of moneys collected. 

Therefore,  a  new  Governance  Board  (the  ‘‘Air  Transportation  System  Advisory 
Board’’) comprised of user representatives and public interest members appointed by 
the Secretary would have a significant role in the decisions of the agency. Although 
the FAA Administrator and the Secretary retain ultimate responsibility for the safe-
ty  and  operation  of  the  National  Airspace  System  and  thus  have  the  final  decision 
authority, the Board would provide advice and recommendations on the creation and 
adoption  of  user  fees,  and  would  propose  modifications  to  them  on  a  periodic  basis. 
Under our proposal, if the Board does not approve the establishment or modification 
of  a  fee,  the  Administrator  can  only  implement  it  after  publishing  a  written  deter-
mination  in  the  Federal  Register.  This  Board  would  also  review  and  make  rec-
ommendations with respect to major capital infrastructure decisions and moderniza-
tion  projects,  the  agency’s  strategic  plan,  and  the  development  and  adoption  of 
ATO’s  operational  performance  metrics.  Finally,  the  Board  would  review  and  pro-
vide advice on FAA’s safety programs, budget, and cost accounting system. However, 
the FAA Administrator would retain the safety and policy responsibilities and deci-
sionmaking authority of the FAA with user input for these areas in a solely advisory 
capacity. Of course, as the FAA is a government agency, Congress will always have 
the ultimate oversight authority. 

The  FAA  Administrator  and  a  representative  from  the  Department  of  Defense 
would  be  Board  members,  along  with  members  representing  airports,  air  carriers, 
general aviation, business aviation, aviation manufacturing, and the public interest. 
The  Management  Advisory  Council  and  Air  Traffic  Services  Committee  would  be 
discontinued with the creation of this new Board. 
Proposed Funding and Programmatic Reforms for AIP, RE&D and EAS 

The  FAA  is  committed  to  a  healthy  national  air  transportation  system.  Airports 
are a key part of the system, and that includes small primary and general aviation 
airports  that  rely  on  AIP  funding  to  help  meet  their  capital  needs.  We  have  pro-
posed  changes  to  Federal  funding  programs  that  will  stabilize  and  enhance  these 
funding sources for airports. 

This  proposal  ensures  that  smaller  airports  that  cannot  generate  sufficient  fund-
ing  on  their  own  can  rely  on  their  entitlement  funds  to  complete  strategic  projects. 
These  airports  play  an  important  role  in  the  national  aviation  system.  Therefore, 
we propose financing the program through taxes. 

I  am  certain  our  proposed  changes  to  these  important  programs  will  be  the  sub-
ject of future hearings before this Subcommittee and look forward to sharing the de-
tails  of  that  proposal  with  you.  However,  today  I  will  focus  my  comments  on  how 
our new structure will fund AIP and our other important programs. 

The  proposed  taxes  are  administratively  simple  and  build  on  existing  collection 
mechanisms.  Specifically,  DOT  proposes  funding  the  AIP  program  via  a  set  of  sim-
plified  excise  taxes,  consisting  of  a  flat,  universal  fuel  tax  for  domestic  commercial 
and  all  GA  flights  and  an  international  passenger  head  tax  for  international  com-
mercial  passenger  flights.  This  universal  fuel  tax  would  be  in  addition  to  the  pro-
posed  GA  ATO  fuel  taxes  for  GA  users.  Like  the  ATO  taxes,  these  taxes  would  be 
deposited  into  the  Airport  and  Airway  Trust  Fund  and  be  subject  to  Congressional 
appropriation.  The  proposed  taxes  are  expected  to  generate  receipts  sufficient  to 
cover the proposed authorization levels for AIP, the Essential Air Service (EAS) pro-
gram,  and  the  Trust  Fund’s  portion  of  RE&D.  The  bill  also  proposes  indexing  both 
the  AIP  portion  of  the  fuel  tax  and  the  international  passenger  tax  to  inflation  to 
keep pace with inflation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

The universal fuel tax and international passenger tax would also be the funding 
sources  for  all  of  EAS  and  most  of  RE&D.  As  in  the  case  of  AIP,  it  is  appropriate 
for users to fund most of the research and development because it ultimately bene-
fits them, but it is challenging to allocate research costs to specific users. Similarly, 
EAS  has  a  long  history  of  being  funded  by  users  through  overflight  fees;  however, 
it  is  not  part  of  air  traffic  control  costs,  and  similar  to  AIP,  is  largely  a  grant  pro-
gram  to  assist  small  communities  that  cannot  support  service  on  their  own.  There-
fore,  the  Administration  has  included  EAS  and  RE&D  funding  requirements  in  the 
proposed  universal  fuel  tax  and  international  passenger  tax  rates.  However,  AIP  is 
the primary driver of the tax rates. 
NextGen—Funding of Major Capital Projects 

As  I  stated  at  the  outset,  one  of  the  drivers  of  our  proposed  changes  to  how  the 
FAA  is  funded  is  to  the  challenge  of  funding  NextGen.  Implementing  NextGen  will 
be  a  unique  transition  from  the  technology  of  50  years  ago  to  the  technologies  of 
tomorrow  and  it  will  require  a  substantial  investment  of  capital.  Financing  this  in-
vestment  is  something  I  have  very  strong  views  about.  Business  as  usual  is  not  an 
option.  The  new  discretionary  user  fees  will  enable  us  to  fund  several  important 
NextGen  investments.  However,  to  avoid  spikes  in  the  user  fee  levels  the  Adminis-
tration’s  proposal  also  would  authorize  us  to  borrow  through  the  Secretary  of  the 
Treasury beginning in FY 2013 with debt service recovered from users of the system 
by FY 2017. This authority would contribute to a more business like funding struc-
ture,  leverage  limited  resources,  and  further  accelerate  the  transition  to  NextGen 
by better aligning payment for a project with the benefits that project generates and 
providing  greater  flexibility  to  take  advantage  of  capital  investment  opportunities 
as  technology  changes.  Examples  of  FAA  projects  that  may  be  appropriate  for  debt 
financing  include  safety-critical  and  mission-essential  software  and  systems  that 
controllers and traffic flow managers will use to support trajectory-based operations 
in  the  NextGen  system,  enhancements  to  the  global  positioning  system  (GPS)  tech-
nology  related  to  civil  aviation,  surveillance  technology  for  homeland  security  and 
defense,  and  potential  facility  consolidation.  This  authority  would  be  targeted,  as 
noted,  for  a  limited  time  period  (FY  2013  to  FY  2017)  and  would  be  capped  at  $5 
billion. We think this innovative authority will give us what we need when we need 
it. 

I  want  to  end  by  saying  that  I  know  we  all  share  the  same  basic  goals  for  an 
industry that we all care about deeply. We want a safe system that can meet future 
demand—one that is cost effective and efficient and that meets the needs of the fly-
ing  public.  We  all  appreciate  the  importance  of  this  industry,  not  only  to  those  of 
us  lucky  enough  to  be  a  part  of  it,  but  to  every  American.  While  I  anticipate  and 
look forward to a frank and wide-ranging discussion of this proposal and others that 
I’m  sure  will  be  put  on  the  table,  I  cannot  overstate  my  personal  commitment  to 
the  need  for  a  funding  system  that  better  ties  FAA’s  costs  to  its  revenues  and  its 
revenues  to  its  spending.  It  is  the  fundamental  component  that  supports  all  of  our 
important initiatives. So, let the debate begin. 

This  concludes  my  prepared  statement.  I  will  be  happy  to  answer  your  questions 

at this time. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

Senator ROCKEFELLER [presiding]. Thank you very much, Admin-

And  we  will  start  the  questioning  with  the  very  distinguished 

istrator Blakey. 

Senator from Mississippi. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
k
a
b

l

.

s
p
e
2
k
a
b

l

12 

STATEMENT OF HON. TRENT LOTT, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSISSIPPI 

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  And 

thank you for having this hearing. 

This morning, we have gotten some FAA proposals that were out-
lined in the budget, and now we’re getting some more of the details 
from the FAA Administrator. This is a very important area for the 
Congress  to  work  in  this  year,  and  I’m  looking  forward  to  working 
with  you,  and  as  the  Chairman  of  this  Subcommittee.  We’ve 
worked together in the past. In fact, we worked together on the last 
FAA reauthorization, which some people thought would be very dif-
ficult, but actually moved along pretty well and in a relatively rea-
sonable time period. 

It’s going to be more of a challenge this time, because we’re going 
to  be  talking  about  more  money,  and  who  pays  it.  And  I’m  glad 
that  we’re  having  this  hearing.  I  hope  we  will  move  out  aggres-
sively  on  the  legislative  calendar,  because  we  need  to  get  it  done 
before the current law expires—I believe, at the end of September. 
And  in  order  to  achieve  that,  we  need  to  get  it  out  of  the  Sub-
committee and Committee in the next couple of months, at the very 
max, and then on to the floor of the Senate, and see if we can’t find 
a  window  of  opportunity  to  move  it  through  the  Senate  and  get 
ready for a conference. 

I think one of the areas where this Congress can make some real 
progress this year, in a bipartisan way, is in the transportation and 
infrastructure  area.  It’s  critical  for  the  future  of  our  economic 
growth. We have tremendous demand for more capacity in aviation, 
not only in passenger, but cargo, the freight rail cargo capacity, on 
our highways and bridges, and with our Amtrak passenger rail sys-
tem. This is a place where we can really achieve some good things 
this  year,  and  this  is,  I  guess,  step  one  in  that  effort.  And  there 
will  be  legislation  introduced  in  the  Finance  Committee,  or  going 
to the Finance Committee soon, that will provide incentives for ad-
ditional  rail  expansion.  Senator  Lautenberg  and  I  are  working  on 
Amtrak. 

Now,  what  we  need  is  the  FAA,  and  the  Administration,  gen-
erally,  particularly  the  Transportation  Department,  to  get  in  the 
game,  provide  leadership,  and  push  the  ball  with  us.  Let’s  make 
this a joint aggressive effort. 

So,  I  say  to  the  Administrator  of  the  FAA,  I  enjoyed  working 
with  you  over  the  last  few  years.  You’ve  got  a  lot  of  experience 
under  your  belt  now.  You’ve  taken  a  few  barbs  along  the  way,  so 
you’ve toughened up, where I believe you’re ready for the task. And 
we  really  do  want  to  work  with  you  to  achieve  some  significant 
things in aviation. I think this Next Generation Air Transportation 
Financing Reform Act is good, because you’ve, you know, put some-
thing  on  the  line.  I  saw,  yesterday,  where  the  House  had  a  lot  of 
unflattering  things  to  say  about  it,  perhaps.  Of  course,  my  answer 
to  them  is  usually  an  answer  that  causes  deafening  silence  in 
Washington,  ‘‘OK,  what’s  your  proposal?’’  And  the  answer  is  usu-
ally not—they don’t have anything to say. 

This  is  when  we’ve  got  to  step  up.  We  have  dilly-dallied  around 
for  20  years.  We’re  getting  in  a  real  box  here.  And  if  we  don’t  ad-
dress the needs of our—the importance of our modernization of our 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

air  traffic  control  system,  we’re  going  to  have  continuing  growing 
problems  and,  I  guess,  gridlock  by  2015.  This  is  when  we’ve  got  to 
do it. 

Now, again, a lot of the problem is, how do you pay for it? I think 
you’ve  made  an  effort  here  to  make  a  reasonable  proposal  and  try 
to  come  up  with  a  proposal  everybody  is  kind  of  semi-happy  with. 
Usually  when  you  do  that,  nobody’s  happy.  So,  what  I  propose  is 
that  we  do  more  to  everybody  and  make  everybody  unhappy,  and 
then I think we’ll have something we can go with. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator LOTT. So, I’m not interested, in this case, in trying to ad-
just  the—you  know,  the  great  dreams  of  the  carriers,  of  the  air-
ports, of general aviation. Everybody is going to have to get in the 
game  here,  and  nobody  wants—everybody  wants  it  to  be—not  me, 
not  you;  the  guy  behind  the  tree.  And  that  ain’t  gonna  work  here. 
So, I do think, you know, we’ve got to think about it. 

There’s  no  question  that  our  current  system  has  some  problems 
with  it.  It’s  not  fair,  in  many  respects.  As  I’ve  been  through  your 
proposal,  obviously  there  are  some  details  that  we’re  not  going  to 
be  able  to  do,  but  I  believe  that—you  know,  Senator  Rockefeller 
and I are going to—with the—you know, the leadership of Senators 
Inouye  and  Stevens—we’re  going  to  move  out  aggressively.  We’d 
like  to  have  your  input.  My  attitude  has  always  been,  you  know, 
work  with  the  Administration,  or  without  them,  but  get  it  done. 
But  this  time,  I  think  that  your  experience  and  what  you’re  sug-
gesting, we can look at and really, you know, learn from that, and 
continue to work to get it right. 

Now,  let’s  see  here.  Let  me  just  ask  you  a  couple  of  questions. 
Your  proposal  does  increase  the  fuel  tax  for  general  aviation, 
like, you know, a little crop duster down in Mississippi, to 70 cents 
per gallon. Now, that’s more than tripling the tax. You know—why 
is that the right thing to do? They don’t put a lot of burden on the 
system.  In  fact,  usually  they’re  flying  under  the  wires,  and,  you 
know,  they’re  just  cowboys,  basically.  And  we  used  to  have  some 
weather—I  guess—what  did  we  call  them—weather  flight  center 
stations,  which—you  closed  those,  the  one  in  Greenwood,  Mis-
sissippi.  So,  I  want  everybody  to  pay  their  fair  share,  but  I  don’t 
want  anybody  to  pay  more  than  they  should.  What’s  your  reaction 
on that? 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  Well,  I  will  say  this.  We  looked  at  the  position  of 
the  general  aviation  community  very  carefully  in  constructing  this 
bill. First and foremost, they said that they wanted to pay through 
a  fuel  tax,  not  through  a  user  fee,  which  is  what  most  of  the  rest 
of  the  world  employs  and  certainly  which  is  the  most  transparent 
and  cost-based.  They  said  this  was  a  great  administrative  burden, 
and they wanted to keep the fuel tax—and we listened to them. We 
said, ‘‘OK, I think that’s fair. We’ll have a hybrid system.’’ Fuel tax, 
pay  at  the  pump,  it’s  the  simplest  way  to  do  it.  That’s  what  we’re 
proposing. 

Second,  we  went  through  a  cost  allocation  system,  and  we  broke 
it  down  into  600  different  components.  We  looked  at  the  question 
of  their  argument  that,  ‘‘We’re  marginal  users,’’  especially  the 
small-piston  crowd,  you  know,  the  ones  who  are  flying  smaller 
planes,  and  probably  not  using  as  much  of  the  air  traffic  system 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

at  all.  And  we—every  time  when  we  came  to  one  of  the  costs  that 
were  involved,  we  were  pretty  careful  to  not  allocate  that  to  the 
smaller  user  unless  it  was  very  clear  that  it  was  fair,  and  that  it 
fell in their camp. 

The  final  point  I  would  make  is  that  we  have  the  General  Fund 
picking  up  several  very  key  services  for,  again,  the  small  general 
aviation  operator,  including  the  cost  of  the  flight  service  stations, 
because  they’re  still  out  there.  We  have  consolidated  them,  but  I 
would  tell  you  candidly,  Senator  Lott,  that,  because  we  have  now 
been  able  to  have  much  better  technology  in  those  centers,  the  pi-
lots  love  the  new  flight  service  stations.  There  are  not  as  many  as 
there  were,  but  there’s  much  better  technology  for  quick-call  re-
sponse  and  all  those  kinds  of  things.  So,  that  service,  they’ve  got 
out  of  the  General  Fund,  and  the  cost  of  the  low-activity  towers 
comes from the General Fund, not allocating it to them. 

You  have  to  remember  that  right  now  in  the  system,  general 
aviation  has—is  paying  about  3  percent  of  the  cost  of  the  system. 
They’re  using  about  16  percent.  Now,  we  can  look  at  ways  to  try 
to make it less—least burdensome as possible. But when you think 
about  that  gas  tax  that  you  just  referenced,  it’s  still  less  than  5 
percent of the cost of operating a plane. It’s not a major burden on 
pilots  and  their  aircraft.  It’s  certainly  much  less  than  the  fuel  tax 
that  is  being  paid  by  the  commercial  operators.  It’s  not  too  far  off 
from what we pay in Federal gas taxes for automobiles. 

So,  all  of  those  things  are  part  of  what  I  would  just  suggest  we 
are  trying  to  look  at,  in  terms  of  equity  here,  to  be  fair  to  every-
body involved. 

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  general  aviation,  of  course,  has  a  lot  of  peo-
ple under its umbrella, and they want to stick together. But I don’t 
agree  with  that.  I  mean,  I  do  think  these  small-propeller  general 
aviation  aircraft  are  different  from  corporate  jets,  if  you  will.  And 
I  do  think  there  has  got  to  be  some  way  to  break  down  the  dif-
ference between the propeller general-aviation planes and business 
jets,  for  instance.  But  that’s  a  long  discussion,  and  we’ll  work 
through all of that. 

One  area  in  your  proposal  that  does  bother  me  is  it  looks  like 
there  is  a  pretty  significant  increase  in  the  PFCs.  And,  you  know, 
I’m  concerned  about  that.  I  want  to  have  decent  modern  airports, 
but I think maybe there’s a limit to how far we should have an in-
crease in that area. They do have AIP funds. They do have airport 
bonding  capability.  And  I  really  think  that  local  communities 
should  put  up  more  of  their  own  money.  So,  I’m  concerned  about 
the increased PFC, and I’m also concerned about—you don’t appear 
to  have  any  regulation  over  that.  That’s  going  to  go  to  these  dif-
ferent airports for them to do as they see fit. Am I misinterpreting 
that? 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  We  definitely  have  requirements  that  we  place  on 
PFCs,  so  there  is  regulation  still  involved.  What  we  have  found, 
though, over the years of administering the program, is that it does 
work very well. As you know, it’s project-based. It’s for specific im-
provements  on  the  airport.  And  when  they  are  finished,  it  goes 
away.  So,  it  has  that  strength.  It  is  locally  administered.  It  does 
not have to come through the Federal bureaucracy. And, to be hon-
est,  I  think  it’s  also  the  best  way  to  free  up  more  AIP  money  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

go  to  the  smaller  airports.  PFCs  work  very  well  for  medium  and 
large airports. Going to $6 a segment, I think, will give them more 
latitude.  But  you’ll  also  notice  in  our  proposal  that  we’re  moving 
the large airports away from AIP entitlement funds, and that frees 
up more grant funds for the smaller airports that really do rely on 
AIP.  You  know,  the  big  airports  can,  between  their  own  ability  to 
raise  money  through  bonds,  local  revenue,  and  the  ability  to  use 
PFCs,  they  have  very  strong  revenue  sources,  but  the  small  air-
ports,  I  think,  do  rely  on  AIP.  We  need  to  recognize  that,  and 
therefore,  strengthen  that.  And  that  is  very  much  part  of  our  pro-
posal. You will see a number of ways in which that—— 

Senator  LOTT.  It  looks  to  me  like  the—that  will  mean  that  if 
you’re  flying  from  Jackson,  Mississippi,  through  Atlanta  or—or 
wherever—to,  you  know,  New  York,  you’re  going  to  almost  double 
that PFC charge by the way this is set up. Is that correct? 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  Well,  it  goes  from  $4.50  a  segment  to  $6.  So  it’s 
not—it’s  an  add-on.  It’s  about  a  third.  But  it’s  not,  you  know—— 

Senator LOTT. Per segment, though. 
Ms. BLAKEY.—per segment. 
Senator LOTT. See, that’s—so, that’s—— 
Ms. BLAKEY. Well, now—— 
Senator  LOTT.—that’s  a  lot  more  than  it  sounded  like  what  you 
just  said.  You  hit—if  you  make  three  stops  headed  somewhere  out 
West, you just got hammered. 

Ms. BLAKEY. There’s a two-segment limit. 
Senator LOTT. Two-segment limit? 
Ms.  BLAKEY.  Per  one-way.  So,  if  you’re  flying  roundtrip,  there’s 
a  four-segment  limit.  But  that  assumes,  of  course,  that  Jackson 
thinks  it  should,  and  can,  charge  a  $6  PFC.  They  may  say,  ‘‘Look, 
to  be  competitive,  we’re  not  going  to  do  that.’’  So,  it’s  a  local  deci-
sion. And, as I said before, you know, it goes and comes, depending 
upon the project itself. 

Senator LOTT. Well—— 
Ms. BLAKEY. It’s been a very important tool for airports. I would 
certainly  urge  that  there  be  more  discussion  with  the  airport  com-
munity  about  this.  We  felt  this  was  a  good  compromise,  because, 
again, it also helps us help small airports. 

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  I’m  going  to  yield  because  I’m  way  over  my 
time.  I  thank  the  Chairman  for  giving  me  this  extra  time.  There 
has  been  a  surge  in  expansions,  improvements,  and  rearrange-
ments at our airport terminals all over America, driven, a lot of it, 
by  homeland  security.  Now,  most  airports  have  worked  through 
that,  and  they  have  more  screeners,  and,  you  know,  the  airports 
are actually, I think, generally speaking, a lot more accessible and 
significantly improved. So, my question—my doubt, in my mind, is, 
do we need to continue to feed that in this process? I’d rather have 
them  take  that  money  and  put  it  in  modernization  now,  rather 
than terminal expansion. 

But, at any rate, thank you, Mr. Chairman, for your allowing me 

to go over time. 

this transportation area. 

as we go forward. 

Senator Lautenberg, thank you very much for your leadership in 

And  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you,  Madam  Administrator, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Senator Lott. 
And I’ll turn now to Senator Lautenberg. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
It was interesting for me to join with Senator Lott in the thought 
process about how we solve some of these problems. And obviously, 
high-speed  rail  service  comes  to  mind.  It  is,  I  assume,  Ms.  Blakey, 
you  recognize  that  the  airspace  is  finite,  and  we  just  can’t  keep 
putting more there. At some point, is it possible that we might say, 
‘‘OK’’—well,  we’re  effectively  doing  it  by  using  the  delay  tactic, 
right?  I  mean,  we’re  saying,  ‘‘OK,  sit  there  for  a  half  hour  while 
the  space  clears  up  between  here  and  New  Jersey/New  York.’’  So, 
that keeps the number of flights in the air at a given time at a par-
ticular  level.  But  with  the  introduction  of  the  very  light  jets  and 
with the record-breaking travel position that we’ve got ourselves in 
now,  record  number  of  people  flying,  what  happens  if  we  continue 
to  operate  with  too  few  controllers,  and  the  load  simply  increases? 
Now,  for  instance,  last  year,  Ms.  Blakey,  you  told  me  that  New-
ark  Airport  needed  35  controllers  to  conduct  safe  operations  there. 
But  there  are  only  28  active  controllers  there  now.  And  I  don’t 
know how much of the delays that we run into at Newark, because 
of  the  unenviable  record  that  we’ve  compiled—and  that  is,  the 
worst  delays  in  the  country—how  much  is  due  to  the  fact  that 
there  might  be  a  shortage  of  controllers?  And  what’s  happening 
with overtime requirements and what will we do to fully staff New-
ark, and, maybe, help bring down some of those delays, as a result? 
Ms.  BLAKEY.  I  wish,  frankly,  it  was  a  simple  as  a  staffing  issue. 

It isn’t. The delays are not a result of a shortage of controllers. 

Let me give you some up-to-date figures, too, on Newark, because 

it might be helpful just to level us up on this. 

Currently  at  Newark,  we  have  31  total  controllers.  There  are  27 
fully certified controllers, CPCs. And we also have three additional 
controllers who are working CPC I–T, as we refer to it, and one de-
velopmental, which is one who’s in training, but is able to work on 
certain sectors. We are looking, at this point, at bringing in six ad-
ditional  hires  this  year.  So,  as  you  see,  we’ll  be  up  to  about  37,  at 
that point. So, the controller issue is really not it. 

When  you  look  at  the  overtime  there—I  mean,  we  have  the 
money  for  overtime—overtime  at  Newark  is  only  running  .8  per-
cent of the payroll. That’s low. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  then  why  would  we  be  looking  to 
bring  the  level  up  to  36  controllers?  There’s  something  that’s  just 
not  working  out  here.  We  were  promised  35  last  year.  Now  we’re 
promised 36 this year. And will we be looking at this next year and 
saying  that  we’re  going  to  go  up  to  37?  As  long  as  we  don’t  have 
them, we may as well keep on adding numbers. 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  The  real  dynamic  here  that  we’re  all  trying  to  cali-
brate  and  get  right—because,  as  you  know,  you  can’t  precisely 
know  when  people  are  going  to  retire;  that’s  a  function  of  family 
circumstance  and  a  lot  of  things—but,  as  you  know,  we  do  have  a 
retirement  bubble  throughout  the  system.  So,  what  we’re  trying  to 
do,  particularly  at  our  very  critical  facilities,  like  Newark,  is  get  a 
bit  ahead  of  the  game,  because  if  we  have  additional  retirements, 
you want to have—you want to ensure that you’ve got enough peo-
ple in the facility. And so, that is one of the things. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

We’re  bringing  out  a  controller  staffing  plan  at  the  beginning  of 
March, so I think that will be very helpful to you all. It’s the third 
we  have  done.  It’s  an  update.  It  will  give  you  all  the  figures  that 
we  currently  project,  by  facility,  We’ll  have  a  range  there.  And  we 
are  going,  also,  to  detail,  again,  the  advances  we’re  making  in 
training  and  what  we’re  doing  to  ensure  that  we  are  going  to  be 
ahead of the retirements as they come. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Ms.  Blakey,  I  know  that  you  work  hard. 
You’ve  got  a  lot  of  experience.  We’ve  had  a  shortage  of  controllers 
for  some  time  now.  And  the  safety  record  of  our  aviation  system 
is  fantastic.  It  really  is.  I  mean,  the  number  of  movements,  the 
weather  problems  that  have  begun  to  occur  on  a  more  frequent 
basis,  it  places  a  strain  on  things  generally.  I’ll  have  some  ques-
tions for you that I’ll submit in writing. 

One  of  the  questions  that  I  have,  and  I’ve  talked  to  my  col-
leagues—and that is, we know we need more money to pay for the 
operations of FAA and the aviation system, as we know it. And the 
prospects of the very light jets, while it is a—it must be a wonder-
ful  one  for  those  who  are—got  one  of  these  ordered,  but  it’s  going 
to  bring  havoc,  I  think,  in  terms  of  the  controller  responsibilities. 
One  question  that  I  have—and  I  pass  this  on  to  Senator  Lott  and 
Senator Rockefeller, as well—and that is, at what point will we say 
to  the  average  passenger  that,  ‘‘Your  ticket  price  has  gone  up  so 
much that you’ll not be able to take to the air, as you do now’’? Be-
cause  one  of  the  things  that’s  helped  so  much  to  bring  these  num-
bers up to record levels is that fact that we have these low-cost air-
lines.  They’re  carrying  a  lot  of  people,  carrying  them  very  well,  if 
you  look  at  their  balance  sheets  and  operating  statements.  But 
what  happens  as  we  get  into  a  new  system?  We’re  going  to  have 
to  think  very  carefully  about  how  we  do  the  financing  here.  Be-
cause  whatever  we  do  is  ultimately  passed  on  to  the  passenger. 
And  is  flying  going  to  be  a  luxury  for  those  who  can  afford  it,  and 
leave  modest-income  earners  unable  to  buy  a  seat  in  an  airplane? 

Thank you. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. That’s it? 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  That’s  it—I  don’t  want  to  strain  the  at-
mosphere  here  into  becoming  a  arithmetic  exercise,  but—this  is 
going to require some significant thinking—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. No—thank you, Senator Lautenberg. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  I  apologize  for  being  a  few  minutes  late, 

and I’m happy to see you, Ms. Blakey. 

And I also want to say that my goals for reauthorization are very 
simple.  First,  we  have  to  establish  a  roadmap  for  implementation 
of  the  next  generation  air  traffic  control  system.  That’s  taking  it 
from the ground up into the air. It’s expensive. It’s difficult. It has 
to  happen.  Second,  we  must  adequately  and  fairly  fund  this  sys-
tem.  The  word  is  ‘‘fairly,’’  as  well  as  ‘‘adequately.’’  Third,  we  must 
adequately  invest  in  our  Nation’s  airport  infrastructure.  I  always 
think  of  O’Hare  Airport  when  I  think  about  that,  and  the  effect 
that a reconfigured air runway system at O’Hare—what that would 
mean for the rest of the Nation. It would be gargantuan. As public 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

citizens, we can’t really understand that, but if you’re interested in 
aviation,  you  know  exactly  what  that’ll  mean.  And  fourth,  as  Sen-
ator  Lott  and  I  would  always  talk  about,  and  that  would  be  the 
continuation  to  improve  small  communities’  access  to  the  Nation’s 
aviation system. And that’s not because we come from little states, 
although  that  helps.  It  also  is  because  it’s  got  to  work.  The  whole 
system’s got to work. This is a system for everybody. You don’t vac-
cinate  people  from  Pennsylvania  and  forget  people  from  West  Vir-
ginia. I mean, it’s a national thing. 

Now,  let  me  also  say  that  I  have  been  increasingly  attracted  to 
the  idea  that  we  have  to  face  up  to  the  great  discouragement,  and 
perhaps upset, of a number of parts of this industry, you pay what 
you  get  for,  and  if  you  don’t  participate,  you  don’t  get  it.  And  that 
it’s going to be some 20 to 30 years before the Federal Government, 
in my judgment, is going to be able to participate the way we once 
thought we could, because of a whole combination of things, which 
I won’t get into here. And therefore, we have to have airspace mod-
eration,  we  have  to  have,  you  can  call  it  whatever  you  want,  but 
there’s nothing in the word ‘‘user fee’’ that offends me. There really 
isn’t.  It  offends  a  number  of  sections  of  the  airline  industry.  But 
I can’t help that. If our job, and your job, is to leave a system that 
works,  or  begin  to  put  into  place  a  system  that  works,  then  we 
have to take these issues on forthright, regardless of what some of 
the criticisms may be. 

You  are,  I  think,  probably,  unfortunately,  leaving  at  the  end  of 
this summer. That’s not very much time, and that’s a great sadness 
to me, personally, because I think you’ve been great. 

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman, 

if  you’ll  yield.  We 

haven’t—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Yes. 
Senator LOTT.—agreed to that, have we? 
[Laughter.] 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. No, we haven’t. 
Senator LOTT. So, this is not clear. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Yes,  the  Senator 

from  Mississippi 

straightened me out, and I accept that completely, quickly. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  In  any  event,  we’ve  all  got  to  be  fair 
about  this.  And  America  likes  to  be  fair,  except  when  it  involves 
them. 

And, this is a terrible thing to say, but JetBlue had a terrible se-
ries  of  experiences  the  other  day,  with  waiting.  And,  you  know,  so 
have other airlines. And that happens; and passengers get furious. 
I’ve been in that situation, from Denver to Jackson, Wyoming. I get 
furious. So what? I get there, eventually. Maybe I sleep on the floor 
in  the  airport.  But  it  doesn’t  make  any  difference.  I  get  there.  It’s 
easier than bicycling. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  And  so,  I  mean,  all  of  these,  sort  of,  per-
spectives of, ‘‘You pay for what you’re going to get’’ if you’re looking 
at  very  light  jets,  and  up  to  5,000  of  them  in  the  next  15  years, 
you have to have an air traffic control system that is able to meas-
ure  both  laterally  and  altitudinally,  just  exactly  where  they  are, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

and  how  far  apart  they  are  from  each  other,  as  well  as  how  far 
they land from each other. And that is science. That is science. And 
so,  I’m  generally  of  that  mind.  OK?  I  think  I’ve  said  that  to  you 
before, but I’m not sure. But I’m saying it to you now. 

So,  knowing  that  the  different  parts  of  the  community  are  going 
to  be  very  unhappy  with  all  of  this,  isn’t  the  best  way  for—and 
you’re stuck—I’m sorry—you are further burdened, with the Office 
of Management and Budget. And so, isn’t the best way, for you and 
us  to  get  together  and  sit  down  and  figure  out  and  hand  the  Ad-
ministration, if that’s what we must do, a solution to this problem, 
and do it fairly quickly? Because the iron is very hot right now, be-
cause  we  have  a  huge  budget  deficit,  we  have  enormous  numbers 
of  really  important  things  being  cut  way  back  in  this  country  that 
we  can’t  do  without,  but  there  are  only  a  few  of  them  which—like 
homeland  security  and  other  things—which  affect  everybody,  at 
one  time  or  another.  Aviation  is  one  of  those.  So,  in  the  depths  of 
our  difficulties  may  be  the  best  time  to  face  up  to  these  problems, 
because we are all joined in suffering from them. 

So,  it  occurs  to  me,  it  isn’t  even  close  to  a  statement.  But  if  you 

wanted to say that you agreed with me, I wouldn’t object. 

[Laughter.] 
Ms.  BLAKEY.  Well,  I  think  I  agreed  with  almost  everything  you 
said there. I’d have to go back through all of those items. But most 
of  it  certainly  hit  home  in  a  very  real  way,  because  you’re  abso-
lutely right about the need to move to the next-generation system. 
It’s imperative. 

I  do  believe  that  user  fees  make  a  great  deal  of  sense,  because 
they are very much tying our costs and our revenue together. They 
have  these  advantages,  which  we’ve  worked  very  candidly  and 
closely  with  OMB  on.  But,  I  won’t  pretend  our  proposal  is  perfect. 
I am certain that this Committee will have good amendments to it, 
and may have a better ideas. 

But  I  will  say  this,  a  user-fee  system  allows  for  offsetting  collec-
tions, so you are not competing against the rest of the discretionary 
budget. That is very important. 

We  also  have  borrowing  authority.  Now,  that  is  a  first  for  the 
FAA.  The  importance  of  being  able  to  put  that  forward  is  that  it 
smooths out these big capital investments. We know they’re coming 
with  the  NextGen.  If  we  can  accelerate  them  and  put  the  system 
in place earlier for all those who fly, it maximizes the benefits. But 
we  all  know,  none  of  us  pay  for  major  capital  investments  on  a 
cash-and-carry  basis,  which  is  what  we’ve  been  attempting  to  do. 
The  potential  that  we  can,  if  needed,  use  that  kind  of  authority, 
again,  goes  back  to  a  fee-based  system.  That’s  what  enables  that. 
So, I would recommend looking at some of the mechanics that we 
have  there,  as  well  as  the  fact  we  believe  it  makes  sense  to  have 
a  hybrid  system.  For  the  general  aviation  users,  they  have  a  sim-
plified fuel tax, which is the way they prefer to pay, and that sup-
ports AIP and supports some of the grant programs—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Right. 
Ms.  BLAKEY.—that  are  important,  like  Essential  Air  Service. 

That’s also built into that. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Right. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  So,  I  don’t  know  that,  as  I  say,  we’ve  gotten  it  all 
right,  but  I  think  that  we  certainly  have  offered  a  starting  point. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  This  is  the  first  in  a  series  of  hearings. 
We’re  going  to  work  this  out  very  carefully.  We’re  going  to  spend 
a lot of time together. And you have the Chairman and Vice Chair-
man  of  the  Aviation  Committee  agreeing  on  a  general  approach 
that  may  or  may  not  coincide  with  what  the  Chairman  of  the  full 
Committee  and  the  Vice  Chairman  of  the  full  Committee  think. 
But, frankly, I’m interested in our thoughts, because what we work 
on together usually comes to be the fact. 

I thank you, and I call on Senator McCaskill. 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 
Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  would  make  one  comment  before  my  questions.  And  that  is,  in 
the  short  time  I’ve  been  here—there  are  two  kinds  of  revenue  en-
hancements. And I’ve discovered that if you’re for them, it’s a user 
fee, if you’re against them, it’s a tax. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator MCCASKILL. I mean, that’s kind of the way I see this de-

veloping around here. 

First of all, let me say, I have reviewed some of the financial doc-
uments—not  all,  though,  I  would  like  to—as  it  relates  to  the  per-
formance of your agency. I have looked at the most recent financial 
audit, and I’ve noticed that there was a qualified opinion. And obvi-
ously,  that  is  a  huge  flashing  red  light  to  me.  To  get  a  qualified 
opinion  on  a  financial  audit  is  a  big  deal.  And  it  was  in  the  area 
of  lack  of  support  for  the  accuracy  of  $4.7  billion  worth  of  equip-
ment.  I  would  certainly  hope  that  the  FAA  would  address  this  as 
quickly  as  possible.  And  any  information  that  you  would  have  on 
that  qualified  opinion,  and  any  information  that  you  would  like  to 
submit  that  would  clarify  the  situation  as  to  making  sure  that  we 
have  the  right  processes  in  place  to  not  get  qualified  financial  au-
dits  when  we’re  talking  about  purchasing  things  with  taxpayer 
money, I would appreciate it. 

In  subsequent  hearings,  hopefully  I  will  have  an  opportunity  to 
go  over  some  of  the  GAO  work  that’s  been  done,  and  some  of  the 
IG  work  that’s  been  done  on  your  agency.  Today,  I  would  like  to 
talk about the outsourcing of maintenance, and that issue as it re-
lates to three things: reliability, cost, and security. 

It is clear that outsourcing of maintenance has become a common 
practice  within  the  commercial  airline  industry.  It  is  clear  that 
there  is  not  the  same  kind  of  oversight  on  these  facilities  as  we 
have  on  the  maintenance  facilities  that  are  located  here  in  the 
United  States.  I  would  appreciate  it  if  you  would  spend  some  time 
explaining, what kind of on-the-ground inspections do we currently 
have  within  the  FAA—I’m  not  talking  about  computer  models,  I’m 
talking  about  kicking-the-tires  inspections—what  kind  of  FAA  in-
spections do we have in the facilities that are located in other coun-
tries? 

Ms. BLAKEY. All right, I’d be happy to talk about that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

Let  me  simply  point  out  that  the  FAA  only  certifies—because  I 
assume  you’re  talking  about  foreign  repair  stations  here;  that  is 
the concern. Is that—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. Correct. 
Ms.  BLAKEY.  FAA  only  certifies  repair  station  in  countries  that 
have  extremely  robust  oversight  capabilities,  as  we  do.  In  a  global 
industry, obviously it is imperative that you have facilities that can 
handle  repairs  around  the  world.  But  it  is  only  in  countries  that 
do have comparable ability to exercise oversight. 

We  have  a  very  robust  system  of  working  with  those  countries, 
of going over for audits, of going over for careful review of the spe-
cific  inspections  that  they  do,  and  the  specific  documentation  they 
provide.  And  it  is  something  that  is  a  very  key  ongoing  aspect  of 
our surveillance and oversight. 

We also, as I’m sure you’re aware, provide those kinds of services 
in this country to foreign carriers. Again, in an open global system 
we  actually  probably  undertake  more  in  this  country  for  foreign 
carriers  than  our  carriers  have  done  abroad.  But  it  has  to  be  the 
case that that’s provided. 

And,  obviously,  in  a  competitive  system,  such  as  the  airline  sys-
tem, it is up to the carriers to make business decisions as to wheth-
er  they  want  certain  kinds  of  maintenance  performed.  We  have  no 
reason  to  think,  whatsoever,  that  the  current  system  of  foreign  re-
pair stations is not delivering all of the oversight and the safety re-
quired. As I mentioned earlier, we are in the safest period in avia-
tion  history,  and  there  have  not  been  indications  that  we  are  fall-
ing down in that area in any way. I know it has been an issue for 
some  of  the  carrier  labor  unions  that  have  been  involved.  But,  in 
terms  of  the  kind  of  actual  data  on  this,  what  we  see  is  a  very, 
very, safe system. We maintain that kind of oversight. 

Let  me  add  one  other  thing,  because  I  share  your  concern  about 
a  qualified  opinion  on  our  audit.  It  was  certainly  something  that 
we  were  most  concerned  about,  after  having  had  four  clean  audits 
in a row. What it goes to, though, really, is not at issue in the sys-
tem that we are advancing for your consideration, of financing, be-
cause  it  is  about  the  construction  and  progress  account,  and  it  is 
about providing those assets with adequate documentation for cap-
italization  purposes.  It’s  an  accounting  issue,  and  it’s  a—one  that 
we very much are going to address. 

But  a  lot  of  this  is  very  old,  and  goes  back  to  1998.  While  some 
of  it’s  from  2004.  It’s  something  we  simply  have  to  clean  up.  I 
think, to be honest, the FAA put a lot more emphasis on safely put-
ting  these  assets  into  commission,  and  all  of  our  operational  as-
pects,  than  on  doing  the  paperwork  of  providing  them  for  the  cap-
ital  asset  account.  We  will  clear  it  up.  We  have  a  major  endeavor 
this year to get this taken care of. 

Senator MCCASKILL. That’s great. I appreciate that, and I’ll look 

forward to getting information about that. 

Going  back  to—so,  I  assume  that  your  answer  is,  we  don’t  have 
any FAA inspectors that travel to foreign countries to look at main-
tenance facilities in other countries. 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  No,  I’m  sorry,  I  must  not  have  spoken  clearly.  We 
absolutely do. And not only do we have them travel there, we have 
them based there as well. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

Senator MCCASKILL. And—— 
Ms. BLAKEY. I can give you a lot more information about our in-

spector workforce abroad, if that would be helpful. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  That  would  be  great.  And  I’d  like  the  cost 

of that. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

Information on FAA Oversight of Repair Stations 

Currently,  the  FAA  has  certificated  a  total  of  4,923  repair  stations,  of  which  693 
are located outside the U.S. and are commonly referred to as foreign repair stations. 
Foreign repair stations must meet the same performance standards as those for re-
pair  stations  located  within  the  U.S.  As  a  prerequisite  for  FAA  certification,  they 
must  show  that  the  foreign  repair  station  certificate  is  necessary  for  maintaining 
or altering U.S. registered aircraft and articles for use on these aircraft. 

In  support  of  the  693  foreign  repair  station  certificates,  the  FAA  provides  over-
sight of these repair stations with approximately 67 aviation safety inspectors (ASI) 
located  in  6  offices  (known  as  International  Field  Offices)  that  are  located  both  in 
the  United  States  and  abroad.  In  the  United  States  these  offices  are  located  in 
Miami, Dallas and San Francisco and, overseas, they are located in Frankfurt, Lon-
don and Singapore. 

FAA currently has a total of 33 aviation safety inspectors located overseas—7 in-
spectors in Singapore and 26 in Europe, including the London and Frankfort offices. 
The cost of having these inspectors located abroad is $9.5 million including payroll, 
oversees allowance and fees associated with the International Cooperative Adminis-
trative  Support  Services  (ICASS),  which  is  the  means  by  which  the  U.S.  Govern-
ment provides and shares the cost of common administrative support at its overseas 
diplomatic and consular posts. Additionally, the cost budgeted for travel to work lo-
cations  by  these  inspectors  is  $1.5  million.  Therefore,  the  FAA’s  total  cost  related 
to our overseas staff and their work is $11 million. 

What  is  also  noteworthy  is  our  work,  on  a  bilateral  basis,  with  countries  to  im-
prove  and  harmonize  oversight  of  repair  stations  through  the  use  of  a  ‘‘country-to- 
country agreement’’, known as a ‘‘Bilateral Aviation Safety Agreement with Mainte-
nance  Implementation  Procedures’’  (BASA/MIP).  Currently,  the  United  States  has 
individual BASA/MIP agreements with France, Germany, and Ireland. These agree-
ments  remove  duplicative  efforts  of  the  FAA  and  the  national  aviation  authority 
(NAA)  and  provide  for  each  authority  to  perform  certification  and  surveillance  ac-
tivities on the behalf of the other. 

For  those  foreign  repair  stations  that  are  not  located  in  a  country  in  which  we 
have  entered  into  a  BASA/MIP  agreement,  certification  and  surveillance  activities 
are  performed  solely  by  the  FAA  safety  inspectors  and  in  the  same  manner  as  per-
formed for repair stations located in the U.S. We should note that repair station cer-
tificates for these repair stations located outside the U.S. are required to be renewed 
after the first year of operation and every 2 years thereafter; such renewal require-
ments do not apply to repairs stations in the U.S. 

Senator MCCASKILL. And I’m assuming the cost of basing inspec-
tors and doing inspections outside of the country is greater than of 
the  cost  inspecting  maintenance  facilities  here  in  the  United 
States. 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  It  is  greater  to  have  inspectors  abroad,  there’s  no 
doubt  about  it.  But,  again,  I  refer  to  the  fact  that  this  is  a  global 
network  of  facilities  that  our  carriers  and  foreign  carriers  have  to 
rely on in other countries. There’s really no other choice than doing 
it this way. 

Senator MCCASKILL. But if an airline is choosing to outsource its 
maintenance to another country because they can do it more cheap-
ly there, shouldn’t they be bearing the direct costs of the additional 
expenses of government in inspecting those facilities? 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  I  don’t  look  at  it  that  way,  because,  up  until  this 
point,  we  have  been  providing  safety  and  surveillance  oversight  as 
a  public  good.  And  that  is  the  way  we’ve  approached  safety  all 
along.  We  don’t  tend  to  charge  for  those  kinds  of  services.  And  I 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

would  suggest  that  the  Congress  has  been  very  supportive  of  that 
approach.  You  will  see  that,  in  the  current  proposal  we’re  making 
to  you,  about  relating  our  costs  to  the  taxes  and  fees,  we  are  not 
proposing  to  shift  the  cost  of  the  bulk  of  our  safety  oversight  into 
a user pays system. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  But  that’s  exactly  the  point.  So  much  of 
what you’re asking for is a user-based system, ‘‘pay for what you’re 
using,’’  but  yet—we  are  allowing  commercial  airlines  to  outsource 
their  maintenance  at  a  much  lower  cost  to  another  country,  but 
they’re  not  having  to  absorb  any  of  the  additional  costs  of  inspec-
tion,  any  of  the  additional  costs  that  our  government  is  having  to 
embrace to make sure that those aircraft remain safe. That, to me, 
doesn’t  seem  to  be  fair.  And  it  certainly  doesn’t  seem  to  make 
sense,  in  light  of  what  you’re  proposing,  and  that  is  that  we  go  to 
a more user-based system for fees. 

Ms. BLAKEY. Well, I would suggest this. We could talk about this 
at much greater length, but what I would maintain is that it is im-
perative  that  we  have  an  inspector  workforce  that  can  provide  the 
support for foreign repair stations, because, again, our carriers are 
serving those countries, and they need those services. I can’t imag-
ine  a  system  in  which  we  would  not  do  so.  So,  the  cost  issue,  and 
how  that  is  borne,  we  can  discuss  at  greater  length.  I’m  happy  to 
do that. 

Senator MCCASKILL. I would like to do that. 
Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  like  to  make  a  request,  on  the  record, 
that we look at, in a hearing, the whole issue of outsourced mainte-
nance. And there’s a recent publication, just out, that goes through 
a lot of these issues in detail as it relates to these inspections and 
the  outsourcing  of  this,  especially  as  we’re  considering  more  user- 
based  structure.  I  think  this  is  a  situation  where  maybe  a  user- 
based structure might also be important. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  LOTT.  Mr.  Chairman,  if  I  could  ask  just  a  couple  more 
questions?  We  do  have  a  series,  I  believe,  of  three  stacked  votes 
now,  so  I  won’t  take  up  too  much  time,  so  other  questions  can  be 
asked. 

Let  me  just  ask  this,  how  much  is  this  next-generation  system 
going  to  cost,  as  best  you  can  predict  it  at  this  point?  I  know  you 
surely  have  taken  a  look  at  that.  Or,  at  least  in  2008,  what  is  the 
estimated cost that you anticipate? 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  Well,  remember  that,  of  course,  a  system  like  this, 
you  ramp  up  from  an  R&D  level,  then  through  the  demonstration 
projects,  and  then  really  into  implementation,  which  is  where  the 
big bucks come in. 

Senator LOTT. Right. 
Ms. BLAKEY. In 2008, we are proposing, in the President’s budg-
et, what I think is a very strong support for the NextGen R&D and 
some demonstration projects, of $173 million. This is, of course, an 
add-on  to  the  additional  capital  investments  we  are  making  in  the 
current  system.  And  some  of  that  current  system,  of  course,  is 
baseline  support,  is  foundational  support  for  the  NextGen  tech-
nologies,  like  ADS–B,  Automatic  Dependent  Surveillance-Broad-
cast. In the 5-years of the figures we have in the President’s budg-
et, you will see that we are at $4.6 billion. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

Senator LOTT. So, it ramps up pretty—— 
Ms. BLAKEY. Oh, it ramps up. 
Senator LOTT.—fast. Yes. 
Ms.  BLAKEY.  What  you  will  also  see  is  that,  as  we  discuss  with 
you all the details on NextGen—and we will be providing you more 
of  this  in  a  report—we  anticipate  that  the  costs  of  the  infrastruc-
ture for the NextGen system will be in a range. Because there’s no 
corporation in America that can tell you, 20 years out, exactly how 
much  those  capital  investments  are  going  to  be,  and  exactly  how 
much  the  technology’s  going  to  cost.  But  we  do  believe  it  is  going 
to  cost  a  range  of  between  $15  and  $22  billion  for  the  infrastruc-
ture. We also believe that there’s a corresponding cost to those who 
are  going  to  have  to  equip  the  avionics  to  be  able  to  use  this,  and 
we  see  that  as  being  around  $14  to  $20  billion.  So,  it’s  a  range, 
right now, but that gives you some idea. 

I  think  we’re  getting  it  pretty  close  to  right,  because  I’ll  tell  you 
a couple of other ways of looking at this. We had a advisory group 
that  comes  in  from  all  of  the  stakeholder  commercial  community, 
and  asked  them  to  do  a  great  deal  of  analysis  on  this.  They  came 
up  with  an  estimate  that  is  about  a  billion  dollars  a  year.  When 
you  look  at  what  I  just  suggested,  that’s  about  what  it’s  costing, 
over the next 5 years. 

Senator  LOTT.  Madam  Administrator,  one  thing  I  do  hope  you 
will do, you need to make sure that you put in place, for your suc-
cessors  in  the  future,  very  careful,  very  close  scrutiny—potential 
successors,  whenever  that  may  come;  we  may  just  keep  you  here 
in perpetuity—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator LOTT.—that there is a process to monitor and watch very 
closely,  because  with  this  amount  of  money,  the  corporate  world 
has  a  tendency  to  gold-plate  it,  perhaps,  if  not,  you  know,  if  you 
don’t  work  with  them  very  closely.  So,  I  hope  you’ll  put  some  pro-
tections in place to watch and monitor how this goes forward. 

And  one  last  question,  CBO  forecasts  that  if  we  adjust  the  cur-
rent FAA funding levels for inflation, and keep the current General 
Fund  contribution  at  18  percent,  then  the  uncommitted  balance  of 
the  Trust  Fund  would  grow  to  $24  billion  in  2017.  That’s  a  pretty 
significant  amount  of  money,  just  by  adjusting  for  inflation.  And 
that $24 billion would go a long way to help us with what we need. 
What’s the problem with that? 

Ms. BLAKEY. Well, I think that the problem, as I see it, on this— 
and I’d like to look at that more closely—but the—simply adjusting 
for inflation does not, in any way, take into account the kind of in-
vestments  that  we’ve  got  to  make;  and  they  are,  as  I’ve  just  indi-
cated, very significant. 

The fact of the matter, too, is that we know that we are in a situ-
ation,  with  the  current  system,  where  we  are  going  to  be  up 
against  the  other  requirements  that  you  all  have  to  consider, 
whether  it  is,  you  know,  the  entitlement  programs,  like  Social  Se-
curity, or whether it’s the cost of homeland security. But in the dis-
cretionary  budget,  there  are  huge  pressures,  and  that  means  that 
there is a tendency to not fund these kinds of capital investments, 
because  they  are  fighting  against  everything  else,  on  an  annual 
basis. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

Senator  LOTT.  But  this  is  a  Trust  Fund  for  a  specific  purpose. 
Why  shouldn’t  we  use  it  for  the  purpose  that  it’s  intended—would 
be my argument. I’ve had that argument over highway trust funds 
and  aviation  trust  funds  in  the  past.  It’s  just  a  point  I  think  we 
should look into. 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  I  will—I’d  be  happy  to  talk  with  you  all  at  great 

length about that. 

Senator LOTT. Thank you. 
Ms. BLAKEY. And I will look at that study, too. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I have to say something that he will also 
raise,  and  that  is,  on  the  user  fee  matter,  let  it  be  stipulated  that 
users  from  small  rural  states  and  airports  pay  far  more  than  do 
users from big cities. 

Senator Thune? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

man. 

Senator  THUNE.  Thank  you  for  making  that  point,  Mr.  Chair-

I  also  think  that  Essential  Air  Service,  which,  as  you  would  ex-
pect,  I  would  be  interested  in,  Madam  Administrator,  it’s  essential 
to  have  a  direct  flight  from  Sioux  Falls  to  Washington,  D.C.,  but 
that’s probably not going to be part of the proposal. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  THUNE.  I  would  like  to  ask  a  couple  of  questions,  and 
one  having  to  do  with  Essential  Air  Service.  But,  before  I  get  to 
that,  I  know  that  the  NextGen  system  is  probably  the  answer  to 
the  questions  I’m  going  to  ask.  But,  since  that’s  a  few  years  out 
there, what can be done, in the interim, to deal with some of these 
hiccups  that  happen?  And  they’re  more  than  that  if  you’re  sitting 
on  the  ground.  Yesterday’s  story,  of  course,  was  the  JetBlue  flight 
that  spent  8  hours  on  the  ground,  and  they  couldn’t  get  to  their 
destination,  but  they  couldn’t  get  back  to  the  gate.  That’s  hap-
pened,  it  seems  like,  more  routinely,  of  late.  And  also,  the  delays 
in  flights  are  now  at  record  levels,  at  least  going  back  to  the  year 
2000.  And  I  know  there’s  a  lot  of  congestion  in  the  airspace,  and 
it’s a challenge, and that’s why we need the new system. But that’s 
a few years out there, as I understand it. 

So,  what  steps  can  be  taken?  I  mean,  you’re  getting  an  air  trav-
eler  who  is  becoming  increasingly  frustrated  with  the  system  as  it 
works today, and particularly given the types of incidents like what 
occurred  yesterday,  where  you’ve  got  people  who,  for  8  hours,  are 
sitting  on  an  airplane.  Maybe  you’ve  already  covered  that  ground, 
but, if you haven’t, I’d like to have you respond to that. 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  No,  and  I  have  a  couple  of  thoughts  on  this—one 
very immediate and practical, and the other one does involve more 
use  of  technology.  But  I  will  say  this,  that  the  FAA  is  trying  very 
hard  to  use  the  system  we  have  to  allow  the  flow  of  traffic,  even 
despite  major  weather  problems,  which  was  at  the  heart  of  that. 
The  NextGen  system  goes  to  much  better  weather  forecasting  and 
a better ability to deal with the weather. But right now, with what 
we have, what we are looking at is trying to not affect any airport 
that does not have to be held from a ground-delay standpoint. And 
a  lot  of  it  is  simply  just  affecting  flights.  It  used  to  be  we  would 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

put ground stops in, full stop for the whole airport, and, no matter 
what, everyone sat there. We are now managing the flow of traffic 
in  a  way  that  is  much  more  precise  and  specific  to  given  flights, 
and,  otherwise,  trying  to  give  other  people  options,  in  terms  of 
going  around  storm  fronts  or  being  able  to  use  a  traffic  pattern 
that will get them where they want to go. 

The  very  practical  thing  I  would  say,  though,  is  that  we  also 
have, at our Command Center, a new service that we put in place, 
about  6  months  ago,  where  flights  that  are  having  massive  delays 
can  call  in,  can  explain  the  circumstance.  And  sometime  it’s  not  a 
question  of  a  weather  delay,  sometime  it’s  an  emergency  that 
forced them down to divert—forced them into an unusual situation, 
and  they’re  out  of  the  traffic  pattern,  and  sometime  they’re  way 
back at the end of the queue. We can help those flights, on an indi-
vidual  basis,  by  giving  them  priority  if  we  know  that  they  are  oc-
curring.  And  we  are  encouraging  the  airlines  to  call  in  and  to  say, 
‘‘We’ve  got  a  particular  circumstance  that’s  a  real  problem  for  us. 
Can we get to the front of the line? Because these passengers have 
been  terribly  disadvantaged  for  reasons  that  may  be  very  legiti-
mate,  but,  nonetheless,  they’ve  been  waiting  too  long.’’  So,  we’re 
trying  to  also  deal  with  specific  problems  like  that,  and  we  will  do 
everything we can to give priority to them. 

Senator  THUNE.  Is  the  technology  available  to  do  that  today?  Is 
this  just  a  function  of  consciously  making  a  decision  that  this  is 
what we need to do? And I know you can’t control the weather, and 
you don’t want to do anything to compromise the safety—but I also 
think  there  are  times  when  pilots  would  like  to  be  able  to  have 
more flexibility to deal with some of these contingencies that come 
up, and it just seems like the system isn’t built to accommodate the 
type of inconvenience that was created yesterday, with this JetBlue 
flight.  And  I  say  that  only  because  it’s  the  most  recent  incident. 
But there are others that have occurred in the recent past, as well, 
that  there’s  got  to  be  steps  that  can  be  taken  by  the  FAA  that 
would  address  some  of  these  things.  Some  of  the  suggestions  that 
you’ve described ought to be implemented. 

Ms. BLAKEY. Well, we’re working—— 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Senator Thune, you and I—— 
Ms. BLAKEY.—they are available now. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.—are  going  to  be  lucky  to  get  to  the  end 

of the line for this first vote. 

Senator THUNE. What’s that? 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  We’re  going  to  be  lucky  if  we  get  to  the 

end of the line for this—— 

Senator THUNE. All right. We’d better get rolling. 
Mr. Chairman, I’ve got one last question that I would like to sub-
mit for the record. It has to do with Essential Air Service and how 
this  new  NextGen  system  would  affect—right  now  it’s  funded  by 
overflight fees, and I’m interested in knowing how the new funding 
structure  would  impact  the  future  viability  of  the  Essential  Air 
Service program. 

So  if  you  could  submit  that  for  the  record,  that  would  be  great. 
Ms. BLAKEY. Be happy to. 
[The information referred to follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Information on the EAS Program 

The  EAS  program  has  remained  fundamentally  unchanged  since  its  inception 
with the Airline Deregulation Act of 1978 while the aviation landscape has changed 
dramatically  with  the  spread  of  the  hub-and-spoke  system,  regional  jets,  and  low- 
fare carriers. Without fundamental change, subsidy costs will continue to rise. 

Under  the  proposed  reauthorization  legislation,  the  Essential  Air  Service  (EAS) 
program  would  be  funded  by  a  mandatory  appropriation  of  $50  million  per  year 
from  the  Aviation  Trust  Fund.  The  funding  reauthorization  proposal  contains  a 
small  aviation  fuel  tax  that  would  be  used  to  generate  approximately  $50  million 
each  year  for  the  component  of  the  Trust  Fund  for  this  purpose.  As  $50  million 
would  not  be  sufficient  to  support  all  currently  subsidized  services,  communities 
would  be  ranked  on  the  basis  of  isolation  (i.e.,  driving  distance  to  a  medium-  or 
large-hub  airport)  and  the  most  isolated  would  receive  subsidized  air  service  to  the 
extent allowed by the funds. 

Senator THUNE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Absolutely. 
Senator THUNE. Thank you, Madam Administrator. 
Ms. BLAKEY. Thank you. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you very much. 
Ms. BLAKEY. You’re welcome. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Hearing adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 10:45 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
The  Senate  Commerce  Committee  faces  a  rare  opportunity  this  Congress  to  sig-
nificantly  shape  the  future  of  the  national  air  transportation  system  as  we  address 
the  expiration  of  the  current  FAA  authorization  and  expiration  of  the  taxes  that 
have supported the Airport and Airways Trust Fund for the past decade. The begin-
ning of the 21st century has marked an era where aviation is increasingly important 
to  the  globalization  of  the  economy,  and  all  indications  point  to  continued  and  sub-
stantial  growth  in  the  aviation  industry.  The  United  States  has  been  the  world’s 
leader  in  aviation  and  we  cannot  afford  to  lose  that  position.  The  policy  decisions 
we  make  this  year,  both  in  the  area  of  modernization  and  in  funding  that  mod-
ernization, will impact not only all aspects of the national air transportation system, 
nationally  and  globally,  for  decades  to  come  but  also  our  standing  as  a  leader  at 
the forefront of the aviation industry. 

While  the  FAA  unveiled  its  reauthorization  proposal  yesterday,  the  agency  had 
indicated  over  the  past  2  years  its  intent  to  completely  alter  the  system  by  which 
we finance aviation programs in the United States. The plan is ambitious; unfortu-
nately, the time provided to review it is short. Consequently, the FAA has to make 
a  strong  case  for  changing  the  financing  structure.  Specifically,  the  Committee 
needs  to  know  how  this  plan  affects  consumers,  our  local  communities  and  various 
aviation  stakeholder  groups.  We  must  determine  that  the  plan  we  have  received  is 
equitable to all parties involved. 

The entire country, rural and urban, will feel the impact of the FAA reauthoriza-
tion  that  we  enact.  The  Vice  Chairman  and  I  represent  regions  that  exemplify  the 
unique circumstances that must be addressed as we move forward with a reauthor-
ization.  In  Hawaii,  we  depend  on  aviation  to  connect  us  as  a  state,  as  well  as  to 
the  rest  of  the  country  and  the  world.  Any  aviation  proposal  that  moves  through 
Congress must deliver the promise of improving access and providing affordable, se-
cure and quality air service to all Americans, regardless of geographic location. 

The actions we take this year will affect the public for decades to come. We must 
ensure  that  the  national  air  transportation  system  continues  to  serve  the  public 
well,  and  at  the  same  time,  we  must  move  forward  with  modernization  at  a  faster 
pace  so  as  to  not  inhibit  the  social  and  economic  growth  that  is  taking  place.  The 
number of airline passengers is expected to increase 50 percent in the next decade. 
The  additional  passengers,  airplanes  in  flight  and  needed  security  could  cripple  a 
system that is already near full capacity. Without considerable progress on this en-
deavor,  our  system  will  grind  to  a  halt  over  the  next  decade.  Modernization  is  crit-
ical  to  the  future  of  our  national  air  transportation  system,  and  it  must  be  given 
the  highest  priority  by  the  FAA  to  ensure  that  deadlines  are  met  and  the  process 
is begun on time and in earnest. 

The Senate Commerce Committee will hold a number of hearings on the reauthor-
ization  of  the  FAA  over  the  next  few  months.  Today  is  the  first  step  in  that  effort. 
We must proceed in a dedicated, cooperative manner that ensures we enact the best 
legislation for the system and our Nation. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. MARION C. BLAKEY 

Question 1. What is the status of the enterprise architecture, or the blueprint for 

FAA modernization? 

Answer. The ATO has made great strides in the development and institutionaliza-
tion of the National Airspace System (NAS) Enterprise Architecture (EA). This year 
the  ATO  approved  a  new  architectural  framework  based  on  the  well-accepted  De-
partment  of  Defense  Architecture  Framework.  Further,  the  FAA  has  amended  its 
acquisition  management  system  to  be  consistent  with  GAO  and  OMB  guidelines 
which  call  for  investment  decisions  to  be  based  on  the  agency’s  enterprise  architec-

(29) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

ture. Finally, it is expected that the first version of the NAS EA that complies with 
the  new  framework  will  be  approved  in  June  and  will  form  the  basis  for  the  FY 
2009 budget formulation activities. 

Question  2.  Capacity/Congestion  Issues:  What  is  the  capacity  of  the  current  sys-
tem?  What  is  the  projected  capacity  of  the  current  system?  What  are  the  projected 
delays  under  the  current  system?  To  what  extent  would  the  NextGen  system  ad-
dress this potential delay? What are the costs associated with delay? 

Answer. It is difficult to describe the capacity of the entire National Airspace Sys-
tem (NAS) with a single number. While some components of the NAS may have an 
identifiable capacity, such as a specific runway in certain weather conditions, other 
components have capacities only in relation to delay or safety measures. 

For  example,  one  can  usually  add  more  flights  into  a  congested  part  of  the  NAS. 
However, the cost of doing so would be an increase in delay in order to handle those 
flights  safely.  Therefore,  ‘‘capacity’’  is  typically  measured  as  the  maximum  number 
of flights that can be handled without exceeding a certain level of delay. 

In 2006, there were about 18 million Instrument Flight Rules (IFR) flights in the 
NAS, with average delay slightly below 18 minutes per flight. This is approximately 
the same level of flights and delays as existed in the year 2000. 

Therefore, if we are prepared to accept 18 minutes of delay per flight but no more, 
the  capacity  of  the  NAS  is  about  18  million  IFR  flights  per  year.  More  flights  can 
be flown, but without increases in capacity, delay will increase. 

NextGen is being designed to be scalable to three times the number of IFR flights 
as  were  flown  in  2005.  The  estimated  future  capacity  will  be  stated  as  the  number 
of  flights  which  can  be  handled  by  the  NextGen  system  without  exceeding  current 
levels of delay. 

The  ATO  projects  that  if  future  demand  were  not  constrained  by  capacity  limits 
in  2025,  average  delays  for  the  entire  year  would  approach  30  minutes  per  flight. 
Average delays would exceed 60 minutes on more than a dozen days. These are av-
erage delays; delays for some flights would be many times longer. (These estimates 
are  based  on  the  assumption  that  the  weather  in  2025  is  the  same  as  2004,  and 
no further improvements are made to the system.) 

However,  delays  of  this  magnitude  would  prove  so  disruptive  to  passengers  and 
airline  schedules  that  it  is  likely  many  of  these  new  flights  would  never  be  sched-
uled.  Available  seats  on  flights  would  become  a  scarce  resource,  and  ticket  prices 
would  increase,  preventing  many  passengers  from  flying  and  imposing  additional 
costs on those that do. 

The goal of NextGen is to accommodate future demand. NextGen will prevent the 
excessive future delays and disruptions that would occur without transformation, al-
lowing many more passengers to fly conveniently and affordably. 

One  way  of  stating  the  cost  of  delay  is  to  express  the  lost  value  to  consumers  of 
those  flights  which  may  not  fly  because  of  capacity  constraints—that  is,  flights 
which would exceed the capacity of the system by causing intolerable levels of delay. 
Initial  JPDO  estimates  indicate  that  without  NextGen,  the  costs  of  delay  between 
now and 2025 will exceed $100 billion dollars. 

Question 3. Are there environmental benefits to modernization? What is the ‘‘con-

tinuous descent’’ or ‘‘green’’ approach? What are the benefits? Tradeoffs? 

Answer.  There  are  environmental  benefits  to  modernization.  About  90  percent  of 
aviation  environmental  reductions  have  come  from  new  technologies.  The  environ-
mental provisions in our bill focus on new technologies and operational innovations 
enabled by new technologies to make NextGen quieter, cleaner, and more energy ef-
ficient. 

energy, emissions, and noise engine and airframe technology. 

Key environmental provisions include: 
• A research consortium for the development, maturing, and certification of lower 
• An Airport Cooperative Research Program that includes specific funding for re-
• An  environmental  mitigation  demonstration  pilot  program  to  demonstrate  the 
noise,  air  quality,  or  water  quality  benefits  of  promising  research  concepts  at 
airports. 
• AIP support to bring noise abatement flight procedures online faster for airport 

search and development for the airport environment. 

noise compatibility programs. 

Continuous descent approach (CDA) allows an airplane to fly a continuous descent 
path to land at an airport, rather than the traditional ‘‘step downs’’ or intermediate 
level flight operations. The airplane initiates descent from a high altitude in a near 
‘‘idle’’ engine (low power) condition until reaching a stabilization point prior to touch 
down on the runway. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

CDA has been called a ‘‘green’’ approach. Its environmental and performance (eco-

nomic) benefits include: 

• Noise reduction 
• Fuel Burn 
• Aircraft emissions reduction 
• Flight time (from cruise) reduction 
CDA  demonstrations  to  date  have  not  completely  identified  trade-off  concerns. 

Further research is being pursued. 

Question 4. What is the status of the Airport and Airway Trust Fund? 
Answer.  The  Airport  and  Airway  Trust  Fund’s  uncommitted  balance  at  the  end 
of  Fiscal  Year  2006  was  $1.8  billion—the  lowest  since  1997  (after  excise  taxes  ex-
pired).  This  is  equal  to  less  than  2  months  of  the  FAA’s  budget—less  of  a  safety 
net than any year since 1975. 

The  President’s  Budget  estimates  that  the  uncommitted  balance  will  be  $2.0  bil-

lion at the end of FY 2007 and $3.1 billion at the end of FY 2008. 

The  Trust  Fund  is  vulnerable  because  our  revenue  stream  is  irrational—it  de-
pends on factors that are unrelated to our costs. We have seen significant volatility 
in  tax  revenue  from  year-to-year  over  the  last  15  years,  which  makes  meaningful 
long-term planning impossible. 

Question  5.  Do  you  consider  the  projections  of  the  Congressional  Budget  Office 

(CBO) in your long term forecasts? 

Answer.  Yes.  Although  our  long-term  forecasts  are  based  on  the  OMB  economic 
assumptions,  we  also  consider  the  economic  forecasts  of  CBO  and  commercial  fore-
casting services. 

Question 6. If the concern is that the system will not raise enough money to cover 
FAA’s  budget,  and  particularly  modernization  costs,  why  not  adjust  the  tax  rates 
to ensure sufficient revenues are collected? 

Answer.  Simply  adjusting  the  tax  rates  would  not  ensure  that  we  have  access  to 
the  funding  we  need  when  we  need  it.  Currently,  all  FAA  spending  has  to  compete 
with  all  other  discretionary  budget  priorities.  The  proposal  provides  greater  cer-
tainty that the FAA will be able to spend the revenue it receives because offsetting 
collections  remove  user  fee  funding  from  competition  with  the  rest  of  the  discre-
tionary  budget.  Simply  raising  the  tax  rates  on  the  existing  taxes  also  would  not 
address the significant fairness issues that exist in today’s system. 

Question 7. Has the reduction in the Trust Fund over the past 5 years been cycli-

cal, or is it a structural problem? 

Answer.  The  aviation  industry  has  recovered  from  the  downturn  that  began  in 
2001,  and  as  a  result,  Trust  Fund  revenue  has  begun  to  increase  from  the  lows  of 
2003.  However,  on  an  inflation-adjusted  basis,  revenue  in  2006  was  still  about  10 
percent  below  what  the  Trust  Fund  received  in  2000.  It  also  appears  that  the  rev-
enue forecast has permanently ‘‘shifted to the right.’’ In other words, revenue is con-
tinuing to run about 25–30 percent below what we (and others in the industry) had 
projected  prior  to  the  downturn  and  significant  industry  changes  that  have  hap-
pened over the last 5 years. 

Question  8.  Approximately  what  percentage  of  FAA’s  budget  would  be  funded  by 

the General Fund under your proposal? 

Answer. 18.6 percent, which is based on the cost of specific public good functions. 
Question 9. What have the trends in safety been over the past 10 years? 
Answer. In the past 10 years (1997–2006), accident and fatal accident rates have 
improved  in  all  four  major  segments  of  the  civil  aviation  system,  particularly  over 
the past 5 years. 

Part 121 airline operations: In the past 10 years, the fatal accident rates have de-
creased  by  more  than  70  percent,  while  fatality  rates  have  decreased  by  more  than 
80 percent. 

A  decade  ago  there  was  a  sudden  spike  in  major  accidents  (13  accidents  in  just 
30  months  from  July  1994  through  January  1997).  However,  in  the  past  5  years, 
with more than 40 million aircraft departures and a passenger demand that has ex-
ceeded its 9/11 base by 17 percent, there has only been one fatal accident involving 
passenger jet operations (the Lexington, Kentucky accident in August 2006 that re-
sulted in the tragic outcome of 49 fatalities). 

Part  135  commuters:  There  have  been  2  fatal  accidents  in  the  past  5  years,  with 
a total of just 4 fatalities in that period. At the same time, the number of fatal acci-
dents and the accident rate in on-demand Part 135 operations continued their long- 
term improvement. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

Through  1996,  the  industry  averaged  a  fairly  stable  25  to  30  fatal  accidents  per 
year. In the past 10 years, despite growth in the industry, the number of fatal acci-
dents has decreased steadily, reaching just 11 in 2005 and 10 in 2006. 

The  fatal  accident  rate  reached  its  all-time  low  in  2005,  at  just  0.34  per  100,000 
flight hours. The 2006 rate, not yet published by the National Transportation Safety 
Board, will be even lower than the rate experienced in 2005. 

Non-scheduled 135 operators: Many safety improvements have been achieved from 
initiatives in Alaska, particularly Capstone, which introduced and demonstrated the 
effectiveness  of  contemporary  avionics  in  small  aircraft,  and  weather  cameras, 
which enable pilots and companies to obtain real-time views of conditions in remote 
locations that have high aircraft volumes. 

General Aviation (GA): Safety improvements have benefited from the same initia-

tives in Alaska and the number of fatal accidents continues to decrease. 

After  a  relatively  steady  average  of  about  425  fatal  accidents  from  1990  through 

1995, the number has decreased steadily, falling to 299 for FY 2006. 

safety? 

Question  10.  What  modernization  measures  should  Congress  consider  to  improve 

Answer. The 2007–2011 FAA Flight Plan charts the path for the Next Generation 
Air  Transportation  System  (NextGen).  Congress  should  consider  modernization 
measures that are described in the Joint Planning and Development Organization’s 
(JPDO’s) Concept of Operations for the Next Generation Air Transportation System 
(NGATS). 

The goals for NextGen focus on significantly increasing the safety of air transpor-
tation  operations.  These  benefits  are  achieved  through  a  combination  of  new  proce-
dures  and  technology.  The  NGATS  Vision  Briefing  (2005)  identifies  key  capabilities 
needed to achieve these goals: 

• Network-Enabled Information Access 
• Performance-Based Services 
• Broad-Area Precision Navigation 
• Aircraft Trajectory-Based Operations 
• Equivalent Visual Operations 
Through  the  NextGen  plan,  we’re  developing  a  roadmap  of  new  technologies  and 
procedures such as Required Navigation Performance (RNP) and Automatic Depend-
ent Surveillance-Broadcast (ADS–B) that will transform the National Airspace Sys-
tem (NAS) over the next two decades. 

Using  data  to  drive  decisions  is  a  key  element  in  improving  safety.  We  continue 
to  promote  national  data-sharing  and  analysis  programs,  like  Flight  Operational 
Quality Assurance, and Aviation Safety Action Program. To maintain the high level 
of  safety  the  public  has  come  to  expect  we’ll  need  to  be  able  to  use  data  to  ferret 
out potential risks before they manifest themselves in accidents. 

Modernization  through  continued  delivery  of  automatic  dependent  surveillance  to 
key sites will improve safety by providing text and graphical data through programs 
such  as  Automatic  Dependent  Surveillance-Broadcast,  Traffic  Information  Service- 
Broadcast,  and  Flight  Information  Service  Broadcast  to  the  cockpit  through  flight 
information services. We will continue to increase situational awareness by improv-
ing  the  capabilities  of  small  aircraft  with  integrated  displays,  data-link,  and  traffic 
information. 

To  help  reduce  runway  incursions,  continued  deployment  of  the  Airport  Surface 
Detection  Equipment-Model  X  (ASDE–X)  warning  system  is  planned.  The  installa-
tion  of  ASDE–X  and  retrofit  of  ASDE–X  equipment  capability  into  selected  Airport 
Movement  Area  Safety  System  (AMASS)  installations  will  improve  safety.  We  plan 
to  continue  developing,  testing,  evaluating,  and  deploying  runway  status  lights  at 
AMASS and ASDE–X airports. 

Question 11. There have been concerns raised over the level of controllers at FAA: 
Does  the  FAA  have  enough  controllers?  Have  we  acted  quickly  enough  to  address 
the pending retirement wave? Is FAA hiring enough controllers to meet your future 
needs?  What  have  controller  levels  been  over  the  past  10  years?  Relative  to  work-
load?  Relative  to  safety  levels?  How  many  controllers  retired  in  2006  and  so  far  in 
2007 compared to FAA’s forecasts? 

Answer.  Yes,  overall  staffing  is  adequate.  We  do  have  some  facilities  where  we 
are  focusing  our  hiring  efforts.  The  FAA  developed  the  Controller  Workforce  Plan 
at  the  request  of  Congress  and  as  a  part  of  Vision  100  to  ensure  that  we  have  a 
plan  to  replace  retiring  controllers.  The  Plan  was  designed  to  make  sure  that  we 
have  enough  controllers  in  the  right  place  at  the  right  time  to  control  traffic.  The 
expected  increase  in  retirements  has  begun,  and  this  plan  addresses  it  specifically. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

We  knew  it  was  coming;  we  planned  for  it;  and  we’re  getting  it  done.  March  7 
marked the third release of our plan. 

Yes, the Controller Workforce Plan outlines the FAA’s Plan to hire and train more 

than 15,000 new air traffic controllers over the next 10 years. 

10 years. 

The  FAA  has  averaged  approximately  15,000  air  traffic  controllers  over  the  past 

Relative  to  workload—Air  traffic  controller  workload  and  traffic  volume  are  dy-
namic; so are staffing needs. The FAA’s goal is to staff to traffic. This requires that 
we  have  the  flexibility  to  match  the  number  of  controllers  at  various  facilities  with 
traffic volume and workload. Staffing levels negotiated with the National Air Traffic 
Controllers Association bargaining unit from 1999 to 2003 did not adequately reflect 
traffic demand, complexity, or the most efficient utilization of both human and fiscal 
resources. As a result of these negotiations, the FAA agreed to maintain a minimum 
staffing level of 15,000 full-time equivalents, or FTEs, for FY 1999 through FY 2001, 
and to increase the level by 2 percent per year in FY 2002 and FY 2003. 

During this period, the agency committed to maintain the required minimum lev-
els by hiring as many controllers as necessary to offset retirements and other attri-
tion  out  of  the  controller  workforce.  The  minimum  levels  would  govern  regardless 
of  changes  in  the  number  of  aircraft  operations  handled  by  FAA  controllers,  pre-
venting  the  agency  from  adjusting  staffing  should  requirements  fall  below  the 
agreed  upon  minimums,  and  from  incorporating  productivity  improvements  from 
new technology or streamlined procedures. 

Between  2000  and  2003,  we  experienced  a  9  percent  drop  in  air  traffic  volume, 
but  saw  a  4  percent  increase  in  air  traffic  controller  headcount,  as  shown  in  the 
table below. The contractual commitment to minimum staffing levels required us to 
increase  staffing  even  as  the  number  of  FAA-handled  operations  plummeted.  As  a 
result,  we  were  unable  to  address  the  dramatic  fall  off  in  traffic  following  the  Sep-
tember  11,  2001,  terrorist  attacks.  While  the  agency  continued  to  hire,  our  cus-
tomers  in  the  aviation  industry  were  laying  off  tens  of  thousands  of  employees  and 
drastically scaling back operations. 

At  the  end  of  FY  2006,  we  had  14,618  controllers  onboard,  with  a  goal  of  14,807 

by the end of FY 2007. These staffing levels are still ahead of traffic. 

Relative to safety levels—In FY 2006, we achieved our performance safety metric 
on  operational  errors.  This  number  was  down  to  4.11  errors  per  million  activities. 
In FY 2007, the operational error rate is tracking even lower. 

In FY 2006, there were 583 controller retirements, which were 116 more than an-
ticipated.  For  FY  2007,  we’re  planning  for  700  retirements.  Year  to  date  actual  re-
tirements are 362. 

Question 12. How long was it taking to train controllers prior to your 2004 report, 
how  long  is  it  taking  now,  and  what  is  your  training  goal  for  later  in  this  decade 
once  you  implement  the  concepts  in  the  December  2004  Workforce  Plan?  What  are 
you doing specifically to pick up the tempo in training new controllers? 

Answer. Prior to our 2004 report, the average time that it took to train controllers 
to  work  in  en  route  centers  was  5  years  and  in  terminal  facilities,  it  was  3  years. 
Now,  the  average  time  to  train  en  route  controllers  has  been  reduced  to  just  under 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
k
a
b

l

34 

3  years  and  for  terminal  controllers  just  over  2  years.  Our  goal  was  to  reduce  the 
time  to  full  certification  for  air  traffic  controllers  by  33  percent.  The  updated  Con-
troller Workforce Plan details the steps we’ve taken to ‘‘pick up the training tempo’’ 
and are briefly summarized below: 

structors to high level en route and terminal facilities. 

troller candidate should spend in each stage of his/her training. 

class size by 33 percent in both en route and terminal initial courses. 

• Installing  simulators  and  classroom  facilities  at  the  FAA  Academy  increased 
• Establishing  a  performance-based  contract  to  provide  on-the-job  training  in-
• Establishing a training ‘‘budget’’ for the expected number of days that each con-
• Establishing  a  national  on-the-job  training  database  to  track  each  controller 
candidate  throughout  the  training  process  and  performing  regular  reviews  of 
this database with each facility (i.e., reviewing training ‘‘budget’’ days). 
• Redesigning  controller  training  to  a  competency-based  learning  and  develop-
ment  framework  to  emphasize  expected  proficiency  levels  (i.e.,  performance)  in 
essential competencies at each stage of a controller’s training/career. 

Question  13.  The  Workforce  Plan  raised  concerns  about  past  practices  that  hired 
so many controllers so rapidly that it overstaffed the ability of field facilities to train 
people  efficiently.  Is  that  happening  again  already?  How  do  you  know  that  it  is  or 
is not overwhelming the ability of the dated training system to perform? 

Answer.  Due  to  better  budget  management  we  hire  throughout  the  year  versus 
waiting  until  July  to  see  how  much  funding  is  left.  FAA  has  placed  an  executive 
as  senior  coordinator  of  the  overall  air  traffic  controller  hiring  and  training  process 
to  ensure  that  we  do  not  repeat  these  types  of  problems.  That  coordinator  meets 
weekly  with  all  stakeholders  involved  (including  en  route  and  terminal  representa-
tives)  to  coordinate,  synchronize,  and  implement  all  controller  hiring  and  training 
actions in accordance with the Controller Workforce Plan. This level of attention has 
already yielded many benefits to include: 

1. Centralizing the controller hiring process to ensure consistency and accuracy 
across en route and terminal functions. 
2. Establishing monthly hiring targets that consider Academy and facility initial 
class schedules to meet overall annual controller on board targets. 
3.  Reducing  the  overall  completion  time  for  both  security  and  medical  clear-
ances by reengineering outdated processes. 

Question  14.  The  2004  plan  proposed  the  introduction  of  high  fidelity  simulators 
and  new  training  curricula  to  shorten  the  time  it  takes  to  train  a  controller.  Yet, 
the  proposed  Air  Traffic  Control  Optimum  Training  Solution  (ATCOTS)  training 
strategy  is  months  behind  schedule  in  getting  an  RFP  out  on  the  street  to  imple-
ment  new  sophisticated  training  simulators  and  new  training  techniques.  What 
seems  to  be  the  problem  in  getting  ATCOTS  launched?  Is  ATCOTS  fully  funded  in 
your  FY  2008  budget  and  accommodated  in  your  reauthorization  proposal?  When 
will the RFP be released? 

Answer.  In  order  to  ensure  a  viable  future,  the  FAA  is  implementing  many  im-
provements in air traffic controller training. Some of those improvements are short- 
term  and  some  are  longer  term.  As  addressed  in  the  question,  one  such  short-term 
improvement  is  the  deployment  of  simulators  to  very  specific  air  traffic  control  fa-
cilities. In the en route environment, the FAA has already begun the acquisition for 
four  additional  simulators.  In  the  terminal  environment,  NASA—Ames  recently 
completed  an  analysis  of  four  simulators  that  were  acquired  under  an  interagency 
agreement with the Air Force. These four proof-of-concept simulators were the first 
ever  to  be  deployed  at  civilian  control  towers.  Based  on  the  NASA  study,  the  FAA 
is  proceeding  with  a  full  and  open  competition  that  will  be  completed  by  the  end 
of this fiscal year. 

One of the longer-term improvements is the Air Traffic Control Optimum Training 
Solution  (ATCOTS).  ATCOTS  is  exploring  performance-based  methods  of  getting 
trained controllers more quickly to the facilities that need them. It is likely the con-
tractor  that  wins  the  planned  competition  will  have  strong  financial  incentives  as 
part  of  the  contract  to  deliver  highly  trained  controllers  able  to  be  quickly  certified 
to  the  full  performance  level  to  FAA’s  facilities.  Early  pronouncements  of  when  a 
draft Screening Information Request (SIR) would be available for industry comment 
did not fully consider the breadth and detail required to transform the FAA’s train-
ing paradigm. Although a draft SIR has yet to be published, the FAA is making sig-
nificant  progress  in  defining  the  program  and  preparing  the  necessary  documenta-
tion for release. ATCOTS does not yet have a baselined schedule, however, the cur-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

rent working schedule anticipates a draft SIR released for industry comment before 
April 30, 2007. 

The amount of funding to aid in the transition from the current training method-
ology to the ATCOTS solution is heavily dependent upon the results of the competi-
tion  and  the  chosen  solution.  The  FAA  anticipates  that  any  funding  needed  in  FY 
2008  will  be  minimal  and  can  be  accommodated  within  the  FY  2008  budget  pro-
posal. Regarding accommodating ATCOTS in the reauthorization proposal, the FAA 
does  not  anticipate  obtaining  any  solution  that  does  not  save  money  over  the  cur-
rent baseline. Therefore, any costs for ATCOTS are well accommodated by the reau-
thorization proposal. 

Question  15.  Airport  funding  for  the  AIP  program  is  proposed  to  be  cut  signifi-

cantly. How is this likely to affect capital projects at the airports? 

Answer. We are confident that, with the programmatic changes we are proposing 
for AIP and passenger facility charges, the proposed $2.75 billion funding level will 
enable  the  FAA  to  reach  all  high  priority  safety  capacity  and  security  projects.  In 
particular,  there  will  be  adequate  funds  to  meet  all  current  and  anticipated  Letter 
of Intent commitments, fund projects to meet the FAA’s flight plan goal for improv-
ing  runway  safety  areas  and  help  airports  meet  their  Part  1542  security  require-
ments.  We  will  also  be  able  to  continue  work  on  critical  rehabilitation  and  phased 
projects. 

However,  the  AIP  formula  changes  and  passenger  facility  charge  increase  in-
cluded in our reauthorization bill are critical to assuring that airports can strategi-
cally target that funding to meet high priority airport capacity, safety, security and 
environmental  needs  of  the  airport  system.  The  AIP  formula  changes  will  also  as-
sure  that  AIP  flows  to  the  projects  that  further  national  goals  and  to  the  airports 
that depend most heavily on AIP to meet their capital financing needs. 

Question  16.  PFCs—The  Administration  proposes  to  increase  PFC  limits:  How 
much  additional  funding  is  this  likely  to  bring  airports?  Which  airports  are  likely 
to  benefit  from  this?  If  AIP  is  cut,  but  PFCs  increased,  are  there  guarantees  to  en-
sure the smaller amount of AIP funding is directed to smaller airports? 

Answer.  The  Administration’s  proposed  PFC  increase  is  one  part  of  a  three-part 

reform for the Passenger Facility Charge program. 

The  bill  would  raise  the  maximum  PFC  from  $4.50  to  $6.00.  This  could  provide 
a total of $1.5 billion to airports nationally each year. Of this total, about $1 billion 
would flow to large airports and $500 million would flow to small airports. 

The bill would expand eligibility to any capital improvement project at the airport 
or  any  other  airport  within  the  local  airport  system.  This  change  is  in  response  to 
requests  from  small  airports  for  greater  flexibility  on  the  use  of  PFCs  to  enhance 
airport revenue generating potential and to help keep airline rates and charges low. 
Every dollar of the capital cost of a project that is financed with PFC under the pro-
posed  eligibility  means  a  dollar  more  of  revenue  that  flows  to  the  airport’s  bottom 
line.  Large  airports  that  use  PFCs  to  pay  debt  service  will  also  benefit  because  the 
burden  of  separately  tracking  debt  used  to  finance  eligible  and  ineligible  projects 
will also be eliminated. The financing community identified these tracking issues as 
a shortcoming of current PFC requirements. 

The bill includes streamlining for the administrative review process. This stream-
lining  preserves  the  obligations  of  airports  to  consult  with  carriers  and  the  local 
community  before  beginning  collection  of  PFCs  on  new  projects  and  preserves  the 
rights  of  any  interested  party  to  object  to  a  project  before  the  FAA.  However,  the 
current administrative process includes many bureaucratic paperwork requirements 
that were imposed when the program was new, and we were unsure about how air-
ports would go about implementing PFC collections. The PFC has now matured and 
controversies  over  funding  of  specific  projects  are  very  rare.  We  believe  that  many 
of the paperwork requirements of the current program are no longer required to pro-
tect the public, and we are proposing to eliminate them. 

This  increase  in  PFC  collections  is  balanced  against  discontinuing  the  passenger 
entitlements for the largest primary airports—the top 70 or so. Currently these air-
ports turn back 50 percent or 75 percent of their calculated passenger entitlements 
if  they  are  collecting  a  PFC.  Our  proposal  includes  a  two-year  phaseout  of  the  pas-
senger  entitlements  giving  airports  time  to  do  the  paperwork  needed  to  implement 
the increased PFC. Every primary airport will benefit from this proposal, seeing in-
creases from the PFC increase from a few percent to over 400 percent. The smaller 
increase  is  seen  in  the  small  primary  airports.  That  is  because  these  airports  are 
retaining their passenger entitlements at current levels, while increasing their PFC 
revenue. So, their net increase in revenue is rather modest. However, for the largest 
primary airports, especially those not collecting a PFC, the increases are much more 
dramatic. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

The Administration proposal relies on both the PFC increase and the AIP formula 
changes  to  redirect  funding  to  small  airports.  As  noted  above,  the  PFC  increase 
could  generate  as  much  as  $500  million  for  small  airports.  In  addition,  although 
large airports will have their passenger entitlements phased out, small airports will 
keep their full passenger entitlement they have received at current AIP funding lev-
els.  There  will  be  no  reduction  when  AIP  is  below  $3.2  billion,  as  would  happen 
under current law. 

Also, small airports will benefit from a dedicated small airport discretionary fund, 
as  well  as  the  proposed  minimums  in  overall  discretionary,  which  will  ensure  that 
all  high  priority  safety,  security,  capacity  and  environmental  projects  at  airports  of 
all sizes will be funded. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BYRON L. DORGAN TO 

HON. MARION C. BLAKEY 

Question 1. I understand the FAA’s goal to make payments more transparent and 
linked to the cost imposed on the FAA. But even if fees collected by the airlines are 
linked to the costs they impose on the system, what controls can there be to ensure 
that they pass on the costs in an equal fashion as well? What would stop them from 
charging  consumers  in  non-competitive  markets  more  because  they  are  less  able  to 
pass on the costs in competitive markets? 

Answer.  The  government  does  not  regulate  airfares,  so  the  competitive  market 
will determine how much of the fees are passed on to consumers, and that will like-
ly vary market by market. However, it is important to note that overall, commercial 
carriers  and  their  passengers  would  be  paying  significantly  less  into  the  system 
under our proposal than under the current financing structure. 

Question  2.  I  understand  the  FAA  is  proposing  a  BRAC  type  process  to  realign 
and close some FAA facilities and services. In the past this has seemed like a proc-
ess  to  consolidate  in  more  urban  areas,  while  removing  facilities  from  more  rural 
areas.  While  I  understand  some  efficiencies  can  be  necessary,  I  think  some  guide-
lines  are  needed,  safety  simply  cannot  be  compromised.  In  the  draft  proposal,  I  see 
that  you  would  create  a  five  person  commission  that  would  be  charged  with  select-
ing what facilities would close. 

What  criteria  are  there  for  the  selection  of  who  would  be  on  the  Commission? 
What  criteria  are  there  that  should  be  followed  by  the  Commission  in  making  its 
recommendations? It seems to me that this proposal is quite vague and leaves enor-
mous discretion with no assurances that safety and common sense will be a priority 
over cost savings? 

Answer.  The  purpose  of  Section  409,  which  establishes  a  process  for  the  realign-
ment  or  consolidation  of  services  and  facilities,  is  to  help  reduce  the  FAA’s  capital, 
operating,  maintenance  and  administrative  costs  with  no  adverse  effect  on  safety. 
The  criteria  for  making  the  recommendations  for  realignment  or  consolidation  of 
services or facilities are specifically required in the legislation to be made available 
for  public  comment  before  being  finalized.  The  five-member  commission  would  be 
appointed by the Secretary before the criteria are finalized, and thus they will have 
an  opportunity  for  input.  When  the  recommendations  for  realignment  or  consolida-
tion are made by the Administrator, the commission will gather input from the pub-
lic  before  making  its  report  to  the  President—and  transmit  to  the  Congress  their 
report at the same time they send it to the President. 

The  authorizing  legislation  specifically  requires  there  to  be  no  adverse  impact  on 
safety. The criteria to be used will be developed with public input, keeping the em-
phasis  on  safety.  The  commission’s  recommendations  will  be  based  on  public  input, 
again keeping the focus on safety. 

Because  of  the  significant  opportunities  for  public  input  and  Congressional  over-
sight, we are confident the process will yield results that will help reduce our costs 
while maintaining the highest levels of safety. 

Question  3.  Currently  in  North  Dakota  there  are  54  airports  that  are  part  of  the 
National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems (NPIAS). Twenty of those airports have 
less  than  ten  aircraft  based  there.  It  is  my  understanding  that  the  new  proposal 
would  eliminate  AIP  funding  to  those  airports.  Can  you  please  explain  how  the  re-
vised funding allocations would affect such smaller airports, and the justification be-
hind it? 

Answer.  The  Airport  Improvement  Program  has  long  been  a  strong  supporter  of 
the  smaller  airports  in  the  national  aviation  system.  On  average,  about  two-thirds 
of  all  AIP  grants  are  given  to  the  smaller  airports  in  the  system.  The  Administra-
tion’s  proposal  continues  that  strong  support  for  general  aviation  airports,  the 
smallest  airports,  with  three  critical  changes  to  the  existing  AIP  formulas—an  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

crease in guaranteed state apportionment, creation of a dedicated small airport dis-
cretionary fund, and a higher Federal share for the smallest GA airports. 

General  aviation  airports  have  enjoyed  an  individual  entitlement  since  2001, 
when  AIP  hit  $3.2  billion.  FAA  supports  the  non-primary  entitlement  program. 
Therefore, we have proposed to maintain it at any level of AIP. Under current law, 
if AIP were to fall below $3.2 billion the non-primary airport entitlement would dis-
appear. Our proposal eliminates this ‘‘trigger.’’ 

However, under current law, all general aviation airports in the NPIAS can qual-
ify for same $150,000 maximum entitlement. We thoroughly reviewed general avia-
tion  airport  capital  needs  from  both  an  engineering  and  planning  perspective.  Our 
review  confirmed  that  not  all  GA  airports  are  the  same.  Larger,  busier,  more  com-
plex GA airports have greater capital needs than low activity single runway GA air-
ports.  The  uniform  $150,000  maximum  non-primary  entitlement  means  some  air-
ports are not getting all the money they need on an annual basis, and other airports 
are getting more than they need. 

Therefore,  we  have  proposed  a  tiered  GA  entitlement  program  that  will  be  allo-
cated, regardless of AIP level. For decades, our passenger entitlement formulas have 
recognized that all commercial service airports are not created equal, allocating en-
titlement  funds  based  on  the  number  of  passengers  who  use  that  airport.  This  pro-
posal applies the same concept to general aviation airports, with a formula that rec-
ognizes that they are not all equal. 

Our  tiered  proposal  will  provide  the  largest,  busiest  non-primary  airports  with 
$400,000  per  year.  For  the  smallest  airports,  the  annual  individual  entitlement 
would  be  eliminated.  However,  these  airports  will  continue  to  qualify  for  state  ap-
portionments  and  discretionary  funds.  In  addition,  for  this  one  category  of  airports 
we are proposing to extend the 95 percent Federal share, which would otherwise re-
vert to 90 percent at the end of FY 2007. 

The  smaller  general  aviation  airports  have  capital  development  needs,  however, 
this  need  is  cyclical  in  nature,  not  annual.  Moreover,  when  AIP  is  needed,  the 
amount  usually  exceeds  what  could  be  funded  with  an  annual  apportionment  need. 
These  airports  typically  need  a  major  runway  and  taxiway  rehabilitation  every  15 
years or so, projects that can cost several million dollars. But in the years between, 
they may have no capital project need. 

Moreover,  modifications  to  the  state  apportionment  and  discretionary  fund  cal-
culation  may  help  airports  gain  access  to  these  funds.  Today,  the  state  apportion-
ment is calculated in a two-step process. First, 20 percent of AIP is allocated to non- 
primary  airports.  Then,  individual  non-primary  entitlements  are  totaled  and  de-
ducted from the 20 percent. The balance is allocated among the states. In FY 2007, 
non-primary  entitlements  increased  by  an  average  of  $25  million.  This  increase 
meant a corresponding decrease in the state apportionment even though AIP stayed 
level. Our proposal establishes the state apportionment as a separate calculation at 
10  percent  of  AIP,  with  a  minimum  of  $300  million.  Thus,  our  proposal  would  pro-
vide  $29  million  more  in  state  apportionment  than  was  actually  provided  in  FY 
2007. 

Since  the  larger  GA  airports  will  be  able  to  rely  on  their  higher  entitlement  for 
more  projects,  more  of  the  additional  state  apportionment  will  be  available  for  use 
at  smaller  airports.  Also,  small  GA  airports  will  have  access  to  the  small  airport 
fund. 

Question  4.  It  is  my  understanding  that  retirements  by  air  traffic  controllers  are 
much higher this fiscal year than anticipated. In fact, I understand that more than 
400  controllers  have  retired  since  the  FAA  imposed  work  rules  last  Labor  Day.  I 
have  been  informed  that  the  FAA  has  predicted  643  controller  retirements  for  this 
entire fiscal year. But, with seven and a half more months to go, more than 50 per-
cent of projected retirements have already occurred. If the current pace of three re-
tirements per day continues, our air traffic system will lose more than 1,000 veteran 
controllers in Fiscal Year 2007. That’s 7 percent of the entire workforce. 

It  seems  obvious  that  the  workforce  and  pay  rules  the  FAA  has  imposed  on  the 
air traffic controllers (the ‘‘FAA Imposed Rules’’) is causing some of our most experi-
enced controllers to opt for retirement rather than continue to work under the new 
FAA Imposed Rules. 

Have you done any analysis of the higher-than-anticipated retirements? Have you 
done  any  analysis  of  the  impact  of  the  FAA  Imposed  Rules  on  air  traffic  controller 
retirements  and/or  morale?  If  so,  please  provide  the  Committee  with  than  analysis. 
If not, why not and do you anticipate doing so? 

Answer.  In  the  first  6  months  of  FY  2006,  FAA’s  retirement  projections  tracked 
very close to actual retirements. However, in the second half of FY 2006, actual re-
tirements  versus  projections  began  to  diverge,  for  a  total  of  116  more  retirements 
than expected by the end of the fiscal year. Even so, the FAA was able to proactively 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

increase  its  planned  new  hires  during  the  last  quarter  of  the  year  to  compensate 
for  the  increased  retirements.  The  latest  version  of  the  Controller  Workforce  Plan 
was  released  on  March  7  and  includes  an  updated  retirement  projection  of  700  re-
tirements  for  FY  2007.  We  do  not  incorporate  a  monthly  retirement  forecast  in  the 
workforce  plan;  however  362  controllers  have  retired  this  fiscal  year  through  Feb-
ruary.  Historically,  retirements  through  February  have  been  approximately  50  per-
cent of current totals. This year’s total of 362 through February is in line with this 
trend.  More  controller  retirements  occur  in  January  than  in  any  other  month—be-
tween  20–25  percent  of  the  current  total.  This  is  consistent  with  other  government 
employees,  likely  due  in  part  to  higher  benefit  payouts  received  from  the  Federal 
pay increase in the beginning of January. FY 2006 had a mid-year impact from the 
contract,  so  monthly  comparisons  to  2006  are  not  valid.  If  we  compare  2007  retire-
ments  to  the  averages  from  2002–2005,  then  we  are  on  track  for  the  year.  Retire-
ment  trends  have  been  consistent,  with  approximately  25  percent  of  those  eligible 
to retire, retiring in the first year. This has not changed significantly since we began 
projecting retirements in FY 2004. 

These  increases  in  controller  retirements  have  been  expected  for  awhile  and  we 
have been planning for them. While some of this increase may be attributed to con-
tract  impasse,  government  separation  documentation  does  not  require  air  traffic 
controllers to provide a reason for their retirement. 

Question 5. What plan, if any, do you have to replace the retired controllers? What 
plan,  if  any,  do  you  have  for  replacing  their  many  decades  of  experience  and  what 
do  you  plan  to  do  to  ensure  that  there  are  not  mass  retirements,  leaving  our  air 
traffic  control  system  with  too  few  controllers?  Do  you  have  or  have  you  discussed 
changes  in  the  FAA  Imposed  Rules  or  returning  to  the  bargaining  table  to  address 
the  air  traffic  controllers’  concerns  about  the  FAA  Imposed  Rules?  If  not,  why  not? 
Answer. The report, ‘‘A Plan for the Future: 2007–2016, The Federal Aviation Ad-
ministration’s  10-year  Strategy  for  the  Air  Traffic  Control  Workforce,  March  2007’’ 
is  the  agency’s  comprehensive  plan  to  replace  retiring  air  traffic  controllers.  This 
plan emphasizes a centralized hiring process and improved training program, which 
includes  increased  simulation  capabilities  at  our  Oklahoma  City  training  Academy 
and select field facilities. We are confident that the new controller hires will be able 
to  meet  the  needs  of  the  future.  Furthermore,  staffing  is  and  will  continue  to  be 
monitored  at  all  facilities,  and  we  will  continue  to  take  action  at  the  facility  level 
should  adjustments  become  necessary  due  to  changes  in  volume,  anticipated  retire-
ments  or  other  attrition.  We  demonstrated  this  flexibility  by  proactively  increasing 
our  hiring  pipeline  during  the  last  quarter  of  FY  2006  in  order  to  compensate  for 
increased losses. We are on track in our goal to have 14,807 controllers onboard by 
the end of FY 2007. 

Regarding  returning  to  the  bargaining  table,  as  you  are  award,  the  contract  was 
implemented in September 2006. Consequently, bargaining has ended. Nonetheless, 
we have been in an ongoing discussion with NATCA in an attempt to reach a settle-
ment  of  the  unfair  labor  practice  charges  and  grievances  that  the  union  has  filed 
over implementation of the 2006 contract. To put the dispute into context, it should 
be  noted  that  both  management  and  the  union  had  signed  off  on  over  90  percent 
of the contract articles that were implemented last September. It was only after fol-
lowing  the  statutory  procedure  governing  FAA  bargaining  impasses  that  the  2006 
contract was implemented. 

Question  5a.  In  addition,  I  understand  that  the  FAA  has  stated  that  under  the 
FAA Imposed Rules new air traffic controllers would make more than $50,000 after 
1 year and more than $96,000 after 5 years. Do you still expect that to be the case? 
If not, why not? 

Answer. Under the new pay scales, a controller hired in 2007 will make an aver-
age of almost $50,000 a year in cash (including base salary, locality, and premiums) 
in their first year and an average of $94,000 in their fifth year (this does not include 
benefits).  In  addition,  the  FAA  pays  new  hires  for  the  two  to  3  years  they  are  in 
training, as well as paying for all of their training costs. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HON. MARION C. BLAKEY 

Question 1. In 2003, you increased the authorized number of air traffic controllers 
at  Newark  Airport  from  37  to  40.  Just  last  year,  you  told  this  Committee  that  the 
authorized  number  of  controllers  at  Newark  is  now  35.  As  of  December  2006,  your 
spokesman in the New York region told the media that 31 controllers were author-
ized  at  Newark.  Why  has  the  number  of  controllers  been  reduced  and  what  is  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

correct  number  for  safe  and  efficient  operations  at  Newark  Liberty  International 
Airport? 

Answer. Historically, the FAA has had various methods of calculating staffing lev-
els. The numerous staffing levels reported to you is a result of the FAA refining and 
then  making  adjustments  to  our  staffing  levels.  The  old  negotiated  numbers  of  37– 
40  included  developmentals.  In  FY  2007  the  FAA  completed  its  transition  to  a  con-
cept of facility staffing ranges. The current staffing range for Newark is 30–36 Cer-
tified Professional Controllers (CPC) and Certified Professional Controllers In-Train-
ing (CPC–IT), combined. We expect that we will hire six developmentals by the end 
of  FY  2007  in  addition  to  being  in  the  30–36  range  for  CPC/CPC–IT’s.  The  range 
represents  the  number  of  certified  controllers  we  need  to  staff  that  facility  ade-
quately.  While  most  of  the  work  is  accomplished  by  CPC’s,  it  is  important  to  note 
that during the certification process, work is also being accomplished in facilities by 
CPC–IT’s and developmentals who are proficient, or ‘‘checked-out’’ in specific sectors 
or  positions,  and  can  handle  workload  independently.  These  position-qualified  con-
trollers, along with CPC’s, are the focus of our staffing to traffic efforts. 

The  process  for  establishing  the  2007  controller  staffing  ranges  involved  the  use 
of  numerous  data  sources.  In  developing  these  ranges,  the  FAA  considered  actual 
traffic, forecasted traffic, past facility performance, the performance of other similar 
facilities,  productivity  improvements,  industrial  engineering  standards  and  rec-
ommendations from the National Academies of Science, along with input from man-
agers  in  the  field,  overtime  trends,  time  on-position  data,  and  expected  retirements 
and  other  losses.  Previous  staffing  numbers  did  not  adequately  reflect  the  fluidity 
of  traffic  demands,  complexity,  controller  attrition,  or  the  most  efficient  utilization 
of both human and fiscal resources. We developed these ranges to ensure that there 
are enough controllers to safely and efficiently manage the current and future traffic 
demands. 

Question 2. Will you use scheduled overtime as a staffing tool this summer during 
the  high  travel  season?  Have  you  budgeted  funds  for  Newark  Liberty  International 
Airport tower operations for such purpose? 

Answer.  During  Newark’s,  or  any  facility’s,  peak  traffic  period,  it  is  anticipated 
that  ‘‘scheduled  overtime’’  will  be  used  to  some  degree.  Facility  managers  are  au-
thorized  to  use  overtime  as  needed  to  operate  safely  and  efficiently.  However,  the 
FAA  and  its  facility  managers  recognize  there  is  a  need  to  be  fiscally  responsible. 
It is expected that, if feasible, facility managers would, along with ‘‘scheduled over-
time,’’  consider  schedule  adjustments  and/or  redirecting  resources  to  the  operation, 
i.e., utilizing support staff or supervisors to temporarily work positions during peri-
ods of high traffic demands. 

The amount of overtime used by a facility during periods of peak traffic also var-
ies  by  type.  Incidental  overtime,  is  overtime  used  for  an  unplanned  resource  event 
such as a controller using sick leave. Scheduled overtime is planned in advance and 
used for anticipated resource issues such as peak travel periods, air shows, etc. 

The  use  of  staffing  ranges  is  now  helping  the  FAA  to  better  predict  the  degree 
to  which  scheduled  overtime  will  be  necessary.  A  facility’s  ‘‘on  board’’  staffing  level 
fluctuates  throughout  the  year  as  people  retire,  transfer,  lose  their  medical  quali-
fications, etc. Taking into account the fluidity of on-board staffing, if a facility’s on- 
board  staffing  is  in  the  upper  end  of  their  staffing  range  it  can  be  anticipated  that 
the  scheduled  overtime  usage  would  be  very  low,  with  the  opposite  being  true  for 
a facility whose on-board staffing is in the low end of the range. 

Our current attrition projections indicate that at the end of FY 2007, Newark will 
have  35  controllers  on-board,  which  is  on  the  high  end  of  its  30–36  staffing  range. 
So,  we  anticipate  overtime  usage  will  be  relatively  low  at  this  facility,  even  during 
periods of peak traffic. 

Question  3.  Why  is  the  FAA  hiring  another  manager  at  Newark  for  a  total  of 

three upper-level managers? 

Answer.  Newark  has  been  authorized  three  ‘‘upper-level  managers’’  consisting  of 
an  Air  Traffic  Manager,  Support  Manager,  and  an  Operations  Manager  for  many 
years. Due to various budgetary concerns, the Support Manager position at Newark 
has been unfilled for the last 2 years. Newark is currently trying to fill this position. 
To understand why this position is needed, it helps to understand Newark’s oper-
ation within the context of the New York District. Newark is one of 13 facilities that 
make  up  this  district.  La  Guardia  tower’s  Air  Traffic  Manager,  besides  serving  in 
that  capacity,  is  also  the  district  manager  for  the  New  York  District.  This  district 
as  a  whole  is  authorized  four  Operations  Managers  and  three  Support  Managers. 
Along with addressing operational and administrative issues at their own facilities, 
the  Operations  and  Support  Managers  address  operational  and  administrative 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

issues  for  those  facilities  within  the  New  York  District  that  do  not  have  the  same 
levels of support. 

So,  the  added  Support  Manager  will  not  only  serve  the  operation  at  La  Guardia, 

but will provide needed support for the district at large. 

Question  4.  Why  did  you  cut  the  Controller  Incentive  Pay  (CIP)  program  for  con-
trollers,  but  not  managers?  And  how  will  this  impact  the  ability  of  the  FAA  to  get 
certified controllers to work at Newark? I understand that the historical failure rate 
of  controllers  with  no  air  traffic  experience  at  Newark  is  greater  than  75  percent. 
Is  this  true?  And  if  so,  why  not  bring  in  experienced  controllers  from  other  loca-
tions? Is there a disincentive to transfer to Newark as a result of the discontinuance 
of the CIP program? 

Answer. Design of a new pay system for frontline and facility managers is in proc-
ess.  While  the  work  is  still  being  done  to  design  the  new  pay  system  for  frontline 
and  facility  managers,  the  expectation  is  that  Controller  Incentive  Pay  (CIP)  will 
be  phased  out  when  the  new  system  is  implemented  (similar  to  the  phasing  out  of 
CIP  for  bargaining  unit  controllers).  Guiding  principles  for  the  new  pay  system  in-
clude continuing the FAA’s progress in moving all portions of the workforce into the 
agency’s  Core  Compensation  Plan,  providing  incentives  for  career  progression  into 
management, and finding cost savings. 

In terms of the impact of phasing out CIP for controllers, a number of new incen-
tive  pay  options  are  being  employed  now  to  attract  controllers  to  higher  level  and 
hard-to-fill facilities. 

The historical failure rate for controllers undergoing on-the-job facility training is 
8 percent. This level of attrition does not necessitate other options that the FAA can 
use  to  supplement  specific  facilities  with  additional  controllers,  but  all  options  re-
main on the table for our ‘‘focus facilities.’’ 

Question 5. Regarding the Airspace Redesign project in the New Jersey/New York/ 
Philadelphia regions, an FAA official dismissed the noise problem as ‘‘at best, a side 
issue.’’  Why  has  the  FAA  continued  to  ignore  the  air  noise  issues  during  the  rede-
sign efforts? Do you recommend that Congress address it? 

Answer. Environmental factors, including noise, are a significant consideration in 
developing airspace and procedural changes. We consider noise, and we do our best 
to minimize the impact of noise. We have dedicated significant resources toward ad-
dressing  the  environmental  and  noise  issues  that  arose  as  part  of  the  New  Jersey/ 
New  York/Philadelphia  Metropolitan  Area  Airspace  Redesign.  Over  half  of  the 
spending on this project in 2006 and 2007 has been spent on developing, analyzing, 
and reporting the noise mitigation strategies for the airspace. The results of this sig-
nificant effort were released to the public on March 23, 2007. There are public meet-
ings  scheduled  for  late  April/early  May.  We  appreciate  Congressional  interest,  but 
believe additional action is not required. The Federal Aviation Administration takes 
its role as an environmental steward seriously and has followed, and often exceeded, 
the environmental consideration required by law with this airspace project. 

Question  6.  The  FAA’s  budget  includes  an  ‘‘adjustment’’  in  fuel  taxes  on  general 
aviation users. Will these increases be equal for all types of general aviation, includ-
ing corporate jets, air ambulances, and agricultural pilots? 

Answer.  Air  ambulances  will  continue  to  be  exempt  from  taxes,  just  as  they  are 
under  the  current  tax  structure.  Under  our  proposal,  the  cost  to  provide  service  to 
air  ambulances  would  be  paid  from  the  General  Fund.  The  fuel  tax  for  corporate 
jets  would  increase  from  21.8  cents  per  gallon  to  70  cents  per  gallon.  The  fuel  tax 
for agricultural pilots (assuming they use piston airplanes) would increase from 19.3 
cents  per  gallon  to  70  cents  per  gallon.  However,  the  total  amounts  paid  by  these 
types  of  users  would  be  vastly  different  because  corporate  jets  burn  significantly 
more fuel than piston airplanes. This is why, under our proposal, jets and other tur-
bine  GA  aircraft  account  for  10  percent  of  the  user  funding,  while  piston  aircraft 
account for only 1 percent. 

Question 7. Has the FAA performed or analyzed recent studies regarding the ade-
quacy  of  the  ‘‘Age  60’’  rule  for  pilots?  Is  the  FAA  considering  revisiting  this  rule? 
What  would  be  the  safety  impact  of  doing  so,  considering  what  you  stated  on  the 
record in March of last year: 

‘‘The  FAA  has  conducted  five  studies,  using  various  analytic  methodologies,  on 
the  relationship  of  pilot  age  to  accidents.  The  most  recent  study,  published  in 
April  of  2004,  corroborates  the  findings  of  two  previous  empirical  studies—spe-
cifically  that  accident  rates  appear  to  increase  with  pilot  age.  Recent  non-FAA 
research, published in 2005 in open, peer-reviewed scientific literature, reported 
that  the  risk  of  violations  of  flight  regulations  increased  with  age  in  a  longitu-
dinal study of commuter air carrier and air taxi pilots. Violations of flight regu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

lations  are  important  indicators  because  pilots  with  violations  are  more  likely 
to be involved in accidents or incidents than pilots without violations.’’ 
‘‘The  ‘Age  60’  rule  has  served  well  as  a  regulatory  limit  in  the  United  States. 
The  FAA  recognizes  that  science  does  not  absolutely  dictate  what  age  is  most 
appropriate  for  retirement.  No  physiological  and  cognitive  decline  is  associated 
with  aging  because  it  is  variable  in  severity  and  onset  among  individuals.  The 
consistency of findings across empirical studies, however, suggests that changes 
to  the  ‘Age  60’  rule  should  be  approached  cautiously;  so,  we  presently  have  no 
plans to revise the rule.’’ 

Answer.  The  FAA  has  reviewed  the  Age  60  rule  several  times  over  the  course  of 
many  years  to  determine  whether  new  and  sufficient  evidence  exists  to  warrant 
amendment.  In  response  to  many  challenges  received  over  the  years,  the  FAA  has 
conducted  studies,  provided  testimony  and  position  papers,  contracted  independent 
studies, reviewed external studies, and invited public comment. Numerous age stud-
ies  have  been  accomplished  with  results  largely  inconclusive.  What  is  clear  is  that 
there is no absolute formula, no single right answer. 

Conducting  further  study  on  the  issue  no  longer  appears  productive.  The  prob-
ability of a catastrophic event is so small that a prospective risk analysis would take 
years, be extraordinarily expensive, and most likely still be inconclusive. Efforts are 
better focused on continuing to gather economic and safety data from industry part-
ners, who continue to participate with us on the Age 60 Aviation Rulemaking Com-
mittee, and undertaking public rulemaking as announced on January 30. 

Many technological and medical changes have occurred since an Age 60 limit was 
set  in  1959.  Current  simulation  technology,  sophisticated  aircrew  training  proce-
dures  and  standards,  and  enhanced  flight  safety  measures  we  have  now  were  non-
existent then. Life expectancy is longer and individuals are more active and health- 
conscious. The Aerospace Medical Association has testified that pilots should not be 
restricted from the cockpit based on age alone and is in favor of rule change. Accord-
ing  to  ASMA  it  is  misleading  to  assume  all  risk  resides  in  older  pilots.  The  Civil 
Aviation  Medical  Association  also  has  publicly  recommended  that  the  rule  be 
changed. 

Recently  adopted  international  standard  allows  pilots  certificated  outside  the 
United  States  and  flying  for  a  foreign  air  carrier  on  a  non-U.S.  registered  aircraft 
to fly into the United States over the age of 60. The Age 60 rule, however, precludes 
U.S. pilots from exercising airline transport privileges domestically after turning 60 
unless  they  chose  to  fly  for  a  foreign  air  carrier  that  has  adopted  an  over-age-60 
standard. 

During  rulemaking  deliberations,  the  FAA  expects  to  be  able  to  make  the  case 
that  proposing  rule  change  would  not  adversely  affect  safety.  As  with  all  rule-
making,  however,  the  agency  will  proceed  cautiously  in  the  interest  of  maintaining 
the current level of safety. Adopting a final rule will occur only after careful consid-
eration of all public input received on the proposal. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

HON. MARION C. BLAKEY 

Question 1. Last month you announced that the FAA intends to raise the manda-
tory  retirement  age  for  commercial  airline  pilots  to  65.  This  rulemaking  will  bring 
our  Nation’s  pilots  in  line  with  the  International  Civil  Aviation  Organization’s  new 
Age  65  rule.  The  FAA  already  convened  an  Aviation  Rulemaking  Committee  that 
addressed  implementation  concerns.  Does  the  FAA  need  another  Aviation  Rule-
making Committee to discuss this issue? 

Answer.  Although  the  Age  60  Aviation  Rulemaking  Committee  (ARC)  did  not 
come  to  consensus  on  whether  the  FAA  should  adopt  the  International  Civil  Avia-
tion Organization (ICAO) standard regarding an upper age limit, the ARC provided 
very  useful  information  in  its  report  and  associated  appendices.  The  FAA  has  re-
cently contacted the ARC with a request for economic information. We do not antici-
pate establishing another ARC to discuss this issue. 

Question  2.  I  understand  that  the  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  process  may 
take a long time to complete. In the meantime, many pilots will turn 60 and be sub-
ject to the Age 60 Rule. Dos the FAA have any plans to expedite the Notice of Pro-
posed  Rulemaking  process?  Does  the  FAA  have  plans  for  considering  issuing  waiv-
ers or exemptions to those pilots turning 60 this year? 

Answer.  Except  in  limited  circumstances,  the  Administrative  Procedure  Act  re-
quires  that  a  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  be  issued  before  any  final  regulatory 
change  can  be  made.  This  allows  the  public,  the  industry,  and  individual  pilots  an 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

opportunity  to  comment.  The  rulemaking  process  is  deliberative  and  purposeful, 
thus  taking  time.  That  said,  we  intend  to  expedite  the  rulemaking  process  to  the 
extent  possible.  While  rulemaking  is  ongoing  it  would  be  inappropriate  to  pre-
suppose the outcome of the deliberative process by issuing exemptions to individual 
pilots. 

Question 3. There are many airports in Arkansas that rely on Essential Air Serv-
ice funding to keep ticket costs reasonable and service available for rural customers. 
Each  year  for  the  past  several  years,  the  President  has  requested  $50  million  for 
EAS  with  a  number  of  proposed  requirements.  This  amount  is  half  of  the  money 
necessary to maintain EAS current services. What have you laid out in this proposal 
for  the  future  of  rural  airports  that  currently  benefit  directly  from  EAS  and  the 
Small Community Air Service Program? 

Answer. The EAS program has had an important impact on ensuring rural Amer-
ica  access  to  our  Nation’s  air  transportation  system.  The  Administration  believes 
that it is time to take a fresh look at the program to ensure that it is accomplishing 
its  objectives  as  effectively  and  efficiently  as  possible.  The  laws  governing  our  ad-
ministration  of  the  EAS  program  have  not  changed  significantly  since  its  inception 
almost  30  years  ago,  notwithstanding  the  dramatic  changes  that  have  taken  place 
in  the  airline  industry.  The  advent  of  low-cost  carriers  has  resulted  in  passengers’ 
being  willing  to  drive  farther  distances  to  get  lower  fares.  As  a  result,  many  EAS 
flights  are  nearly  empty  as  passengers  continue  to  drive  to  nearby,  major  airports. 
Nonetheless,  there  is  a  core  of  communities  for  which  EAS  truly  is  essential,  such 
as those that have no roads at all. The Administration’s proposed changes focus the 
resources  on  the  most  isolated  communities,  ensuring  that  they  would  continue  to 
enjoy  the  same  service  levels  that  have  been  supporting  them  for  nearly  30  years. 
It  is  important  to  note  the  extensive  support  that  the  Department  provides  for 
small airports in terms of supporting the infrastructure that make any service pos-
sible.  In  the  last  2  years  (FY  2005  and  FY  2006),  the  FAA  has  provided  over  $4 
billion  in  grants  for  small  airports,  or  nearly  2⁄3 of  the  Airport  Improvement  Pro-
gram  (AIP).  Furthermore,  the  Department’s  reauthorization  proposal  would  con-
tinue  to  direct  AIP  to  small  airports.  AIP  will  provide  over  $8.5  billion  to  airports 
of all sizes through the term of the bill. The reauthorization proposal would also add 
new  AIP  eligibility  for  ADS–B  ground  stations  and  expanded  eligibility  for  revenue 
producing projects at small airports that will help their financial stability. 

Question 4. What are the generally accepted methods and principles for assigning 

costs of ATC services to users? 

Answer. The International Civil Aviation Organization (ICAO) specifically calls on 
states  to  ensure  that  no  users  are  burdened  with  air  navigation  services  costs  not 
properly allocable to them according to sound accounting principles. Where cost allo-
cation needs to take place among users, the total costs should be allocated equitably 
among  the  different  categories  of  users  served  by  the  route  facilities  and  services 
concerned.  Every  air  navigation  service  provider  we  studied  uses  accounting  prin-
ciples similar to FAA’s for cost allocation. Most use economic principles such as abil-
ity/willingness  to  pay  in  cost  recovery  (as  does  the  FAA’s  proposal  by  allowing  air-
craft  weight  to  be  a  factor  in  the  terminal  fees).  However,  allocation  and  recovery 
are  separate  issues.  NAV  CANADA  uses  an  accounting  method  known  as  ‘‘activity- 
based  costing’’  to  allocate  costs  among  services,  but  does  not  allocate  costs  among 
users.  (In  Canada,  all  users  pay  user  fees,  except  for  low-end  GA,  which  pays  an 
annual fee that is not intended to cover its cost.) 

Question 5. How do the views of carriers and the general aviation community com-
pare  and  contrast  with  regard  to  the  assignment  of  costs  proposed  in  your  plan  for 
ATC services? 

Answer.  The  air  carriers  generally  support  our  assignment  of  costs,  though  feel 
that we should have assigned more costs to GA in cases where GA uses a TRACON, 
but  lands  at  a  secondary  airport.  High-end  general  aviation  believes  that  we  as-
signed them too much cost because the system was built for commercial airlines and 
we treated airline jets and corporate jets equally when they used the same facilities. 
(To  the  extent  corporate  jets  do  not  use  the  large  airports  favored  by  airlines,  they 
do  not  get  burdened  with  the  costs  of  those  facilities.)  Low-end  general  aviation 
agrees with our allocation that they are marginal users, although the allocation still 
likely assigns them a higher total cost than they would like. 

Question  6.  How  do  the  FAA  and  airport  industry  estimates  of  planned  airport 

capital development compare? 

Answer.  While  it  appears  that  the  actual  increase  in  airport  capital  needs  is  far 
greater  than  the  4  percent  that  FAA  has  been  reporting,  once  the  figures  are  nor-
malized and the rules applied similarly, the difference is very small. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

Differences between the ACI and NPIAS estimates for 80 airports totaled $34 bil-
lion.  FAA  and  ACI  agreed  to  compare  estimates  for  the  14  airports  that  accounted 
for $29 billion, or 85 percent of the difference. When the ACI numbers are adjusted 
to  be  comparable  to  the  NPAIS  (2005–2009,  AIP-eligible,  unfunded  development 
only)  the  total  difference  for  the  14  airports  was  reduced  from  $29  billion  to  $201 
million, i.e., 99 percent of the difference was eliminated. 

Industry estimates include funding that is already identified, but not yet paid-out 
(PFCs,  local  or  state  funds,  bonds,  cash  earnings).  However,  once  a  funding  source 
has  already  been  identified,  FAA  does  not  consider  that  as  an  unfunded  need  and 
those  costs  are  removed  from  the  ‘‘needs’’  column.  This  accounts  for  $10  billion  of 
the difference. 

The industry estimates include $6 billion beyond the 5-year period covered in the 
NPIAS  report.  The  industry  estimates  include  $8  billion  in  ineligible  projects  that 
cannot be funded with AIP. Finally, the industry groups include $5 billion in a cat-
egory  called  ‘‘other’’  which  is  not  included  in  the  FAA  estimate  since  our  estimates 
only include identified and specific items. 

Question  7.  How  much  are  airports  spending  on  capital  development  and  where 

is the money coming from? 

Answer.  Historically,  AIP  has  accounted  for  approximately  20  percent  of  capital 
investments  at  all  airports  as  is  reflected  in  GAO  reports  and  testimony  issued  in 
1998  and  1999.  Other  sources  of  funding  include  airport  revenue  bonds,  rates  and 
charges assessed against carriers, commercial revenue (e.g., parking lots and conces-
sion revenue) aviation fuel taxes and (for commercial service airports) passenger fa-
cility charges. However, within the commercial service airport category, the percent-
age  of  AIP  participation  varies  with  the  size  of  airports.  Smaller  airports  are  gen-
erally more dependent on AIP funding to meet capital development needs. 

According  to  GAO  testimony  in  2007,  from  2001  through  2005,  airports  received 
an  average  of  about  $1.3  billion  a  year  for  planned  capital  development  including 
eligible  and  ineligible  work.  The  primary  source  of  funding  was  bonds,  which  aver-
ages  almost  $6.5  billion  per  year  (or  about  50  percent),  followed  by  Federal  grants 
and  passenger  facility  charges,  which  account  for  $3.6  billion  (27  percent)  and  $2.2 
billion (17 percent) respectively. 

Question  8.  If  projected  funding  is  less  than  planned  development  for  some  air-

ports, what options exist for increasing funding for airports? 

Answer.  Generally  5-year  planned  development  for  airports  as  shown  in  the  Na-
tional Plan of Integrated Airport Systems exceeds the funding available for airports 
in that same period. On an annual basis, AIP grants have typically funded less than 
half  of  the  Nation’s  planned  airport  development.  The  balance  of  the  funds  come 
from  a  combination  of  state  or  local  investment,  private  financing,  airport  revenue 
and  Passenger  Facility  Charges.  The  proposed  increase  in  the  Passenger  Facility 
Charge  will  bring  an  additional  $1.5  billion  to  airports  to  use  for  capital  develop-
ment  projects.  The  increase  in  PFCs  flowing  to  the  70  or  so  largest  airports  will 
more  than  offset  the  proposed  reduction  in  passenger  entitlements  for  those  air-
ports. 

However, FAA recognizes that airport financial need is stratified, with the largest 
of the primary airports in a stronger financial position with a greater ability to raise 
capital,  fund  projects  with  little  or  no  direct  Federal  assistance,  and  work  directly 
with the financial markets on their largest projects. 

Smaller airports rely more heavily on Federal funds for their capital development. 
For this reason, we have proposed two provisions specifically targeted to smaller air-
ports.  For  smaller  primary  airports,  we  have  proposed  keeping  entitlements  at  cur-
rent levels, keeping the minimum entitlement at $1 million. We would eliminate the 
trigger that reduces the minimum entitlement level to $650,000 and otherwise cuts 
an airport’s entitlements in half whenever AIP is below $3.2 billion. 

For  the  non-primary  airports,  we  have  proposed  tiering  the  non-primary  entitle-
ments,  which  will  direct  more  annual  entitlement  funding  to  the  general  aviation 
airports  that  have  the  greatest  planned  development  needs.  We  have  also  proposed 
increasing  the  state  apportionment  and  adding  a  minimum  state  apportionment 
level  of  $300  million.  (Currently,  there  is  no  minimum  amount  of  state  apportion-
ment.)  We  also  propose  to  increased  the  minimum  discretionary  that  FAA  can  use 
for  high  priority  projects  and  create  a  separate  Small  Airport  Discretionary  fund. 
This  larger  amount  of  discretionary  money  will  make  it  easier  for  small  airports  to 
compete  for  their  high  priority  projects.  These  two  changes  will  make  a  big  dif-
ference  to  small  non-primary  airports,  since  most  grant  funding  is  from  a  combina-
tion  of  state  apportionment  and  discretionary  dollars,  not  the  non-primary  entitle-
ment. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Question 9. I understand that the FAA plans to hire nearly 12,000 new air traffic 
controllers  by  2016.  Currently,  applicants  are  only  accepted  from  the  Controller 
Training  Initiative  (CTI)  or  the  Veteran’s  Readjustment  Appointment  (VRA).  What 
are the eligibility requirements for veterans? 

Answer.  In  addition  to  applicants  from  CTI  and  VRA,  we  are  also  currently  ac-
cepting  applicants  from  the  general  public,  former  FAA  controllers,  and  employees 
of other agencies. Veterans without experience in air traffic control can apply to the 
general  public  announcements.  Veterans’  preference  applies  when  we  hire  from  the 
general public. Additionally, we have recently entered into a job training agreement 
with  the  Department  of  Veterans  Affairs  (VA),  Veterans  Benefits  Administration 
(VBA). The VA will recruit veterans enrolled in VBA’s Vocational Rehabilitation and 
Employment (VR&E) Program. Under the VR&E Program, the VBA can pay for the 
veterans’ training at the FAA Academy, and FAA will provide individuals who suc-
cessfully  complete  Academy  training  with  their  own  separate  hiring  mechanism 
within the FAA’s controller hiring processes. 

The  FAA  has  adopted  the  same  basic  requirements  for  VRA  that  the  rest  of  gov-
ernment uses. These are listed below. The FAA’s VRA announcements are targeted 
to former military controllers, so the applicants must also have appropriate creden-
tials as controllers from the military and meet the other eligibility requirements for 
the air traffic control occupation. 

VRA Eligibility Requirements: The following veterans are eligible: 
• Veterans who have a compensable service-connected disability rating of 10 per-

cent or more; 

• Veterans  who  served  on  active  duty  in  the  Armed  Forces  during  a  war  or  in 
a  campaign  or  expedition  for  which  a  campaign  badge  or  expeditionary  medal 
was awarded; 

• Veterans who served on active duty in the Armed Forces during a military oper-
ation  for  which  an  Armed  Forces  Service  Medal  was  awarded  on  or  after  June 
1, 1992; or 

• Veterans  who  have  separated  from  active  service  (for  other  than  training  pur-
poses)  within  the  last  3  years.  In  addition  to  the  above  criteria,  all  veterans 
must have been discharged under general or honorable conditions. 

Question  10.  The  reason  I  ask  is  because  I  have  been  contacted  by  an  Arkansas 
veteran experiencing difficulty with the air traffic controller hiring process. I believe 
our country’s experienced veterans would be a great asset to the FAA. Does the FAA 
plan  to  re-evaluate  the  hiring  process  or  extend  eligibility  to  ensure  qualified  vet-
erans  are  given  adequate  consideration  and  positions  are  filled  based  on  merit  and 
qualifications, not on eligibility technicalities? 

Answer. The FAA has adopted the same basic requirements for VRA that the rest 
of government uses. These are listed in the response to Question 9. The FAA’s VRA 
announcements  are  targeted  to  former  military  controllers,  so  the  applicants  must 
also  have  appropriate  credentials  as  controllers  from  the  military  and  meet  the 
other  eligibility  requirements  for  the  air  traffic  control  occupation.  As  noted  in  re-
sponse  to  Question  9,  veterans  without  experience  in  air  traffic  control  can  apply 
to  the  general  public  announcements.  Veterans’  preference  applies  when  we  hire 
from the general public. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. THOMAS R. CARPER TO 

HON. MARION C. BLAKEY 

Question 1. Noise impacts have begun to become such a big problem that the air-
port expansions are meeting with greater and greater opposition. How does the FAA 
plan to reduce the noise impacts on surrounding neighborhoods? 

Answer.  The  Administration  proposal  has  a  four-part  approach  to  reducing  noise 
impacts  on  neighborhoods  that  surround  airports.  First,  we  have  recommended  ex-
tending  a  new  program  that  supports  noise-impacted  communities  with  grants  for 
planning  and  projects  to  reduce  non-compatible  land  uses.  This  program  started  as 
a pilot program in Vision 100, but was scheduled to sunset September 30, 2008. 

Next,  we  have  expanded  AIP  eligibility  to  include  environmental  assessment  of 
flight  procedures  that  are  determined  to  have  impact  on  noise  reduction  under  14 
CFR  Part  150,  Airport  Noise  Compatibility  Planning.  Operational  procedures  offer 
significant promise for near-term environmental improvements. 

Third, we have taken a longer-term view by adding $5 million in the Airport Co-
operative  Research  Program  for  dedicated  environmental  research  and  standing-up 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

a  new  ‘‘Proof  of  Concept’’  program  that  will  allow  current  environmental  research, 
including noise reduction, to be field-tested on airports. 

Finally, we propose to provide a more stable funding source for airport noise com-
patibility programs by converting the calculation of the set aside from a percentage 
of discretionary AIP funds to a percentage of total AIP funds. The set-aside will no 
longer  be  subject  to  reduction  if  the  level  of  AIP  apportionments  or  apportionment 
carry-over funds goes up. 

This four-part program will help communities see immediate and long-term reduc-

tion of impacts from airport noise. 

Question  2.  What  strategies  can  airports  employ  with  regard  to  routing  planes 

and keeping them at higher altitudes for longer? 

Answer.  There  are  several  strategies  that  may  be  included  in  airspace  designs  to 
mitigate  the  impact  of  noise  on  communities  near  airports.  Designers  may  be  able 
to  concentrate  departure  traffic  over  less  noise  sensitive  areas,  such  as  developing 
tracks  that  fly  over  water.  Aircraft  might  be  kept  at  higher  altitudes  by  optimizing 
vertical  profiles  for  arrivals  and  by  raising  altitudes  for  level  flight  segments.  Mod-
ern  navigation  methods,  such  as  Area  Navigation  (RNAV),  might  be  used  to  adjust 
ground  tracks  over  nonresidential  areas.  It  is  important  to  note  that  noise,  espe-
cially close to an airport, cannot be eliminated by just moving routes. Rerouting air-
craft  may  redistribute  noise,  potentially  minimizing  exposure  to  residential  areas. 
Question 3. What is the state of development of new, quieter aircraft? How might 
Congress  further  research  into  new,  quieter  technologies  for  the  next  stage  of  air-
craft? 

Answer.  We  are  currently  facing  larger  research  and  development  challenges  at 
a time when we need to make larger technological leaps to continue to reduce noise 
while  the  aviation  system  grows.  NASA  and  industry  have  conceived  some  prom-
ising  concepts  under  the  Quiet  Aircraft  Technology  (QAT)  program.  Examples  in-
clude: 

• quieter engine liners 
• variable shape chevrons 
• advanced  features  in  flight  management  systems  for  quiet  and  efficient  climb 

and landing procedures 

The QAT program has come to a conclusion, and there is no follow-up NASA pro-
gram  to  mature  the  research.  Therefore,  we  need  more  advanced  and  applied  re-
search and development to move promising concepts from the lab to the aircraft. To 
bring  technology  improvements  online  for  NextGen  requires  successful  technology 
maturation and certification within the next 5–8 years. 

Congress  can  give  favorable  consideration  to  our  proposal  in  section  606  of  our 
bill  for  a  research  consortium  to  bring  new  aircraft  technologies  to  maturity,  with 
performance  objectives  for  noise  (10  decibel  reduction  to  limit  significant  noise  im-
pact inside the airport boundary)—as well as for emissions, energy efficiency, alter-
native fuels. Work would be funded through NextGen. 

Question 4. What is the FAA doing to advance the use of quieter Stage 3 aircraft 

in the cargo industry where the lifespan of planes is much longer? 

Answer. All large subsonic turbojet airplanes (over 75,000 lbs) that operate in the 
contiguous U.S. are Stage 3. There is no difference in Stage 3 requirements for air-
lines or cargo aircraft. The current requirement was mandated in the Airport Noise 
and  Capacity  Act  of  1990,  where  Congress  directed  that  domestic  and  foreign  civil 
subsonic turbojet airplanes with maximum weight of more than 75,000 pounds meet 
Stage  3  standards  to  operate  within  the  contiguous  United  States  after  December 
31, 1999. 

Question 5. How many air traffic controllers have left or retired since contract ne-
gotiations fell apart and work rule changes were imposed? What do you believe has 
been the impact of the rule changes on employee retention? 

Answer.  In  FY  2007  year-to-date,  362  air  traffic  controllers  have  retired  and  an-
other  41  retired  in  the  last  few  weeks  of  September  2006  (FY  2006)  after  the  con-
tract  was  implemented.  In  the  first  6  months  of  FY  2006,  FAA’s  retirement  projec-
tions  tracked  very  close  to  actual  retirements.  However,  in  the  second  half  of  FY 
2006, actual retirements versus projections began to diverge, for a total of 116 more 
retirements than expected by the end of the fiscal year. Even so, the FAA was able 
to  proactively  increase  its  planned  new  hires  during  the  last  quarter  of  the  year  to 
compensate for the increased retirements. 

In  FY  2007,  we  projected  700  retirements.  Historically,  retirements  through  Feb-
ruary  have  been  approximately  50  percent  of  current  totals.  This  year’s  total  (362 
through February 2007) is in line with this trend. More controller retirements occur 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

in  January  than  in  any  other  month—between  20–25  percent  of  the  current  total. 
This  is  consistent  with  other  government  employees,  likely  due  in  part  to  higher 
benefit payouts received from the Federal pay increase in the beginning of January. 
These  increases  in  controller  retirements  have  been  expected  for  a  while  and  we 
have been planning for them. While some of this increase may be attributed to con-
tract  impasse,  government  separation  documentation  does  not  require  air  traffic 
controllers to provide a reason for their retirement. 

Question  6.  Much  of  the  needed  modernization  that  is  needed  is  in  the  air  traffic 
control  system.  What  has  been  the  involvement  of  the  controllers  in  the  develop-
ment of that new system? 

Answer.  The  Operational  Evolution  Partnership  office  with  the  ATO  has  an  air 
traffic  controller  on  full  time  detail.  The  current  plan  is  to  keep  at  least  one  con-
troller assigned to that office at all times. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:54 Mar 12, 2012 Jkt 073237 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\73237.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

